Aeronautical_engineer: "Aeronautical engineering" was the original term for "aeronautical engineering". It was the original term for "aeronautical engineering" and was the original term for "aeronautical engineering".
Biomedical_engineering: or medical engineering is the study of the biomedical sciences. Biomedical engineering or medical engineering is the study of the biomedical sciences.
Biomedical_engineering: Biomedical engineering has recently emerged as its new frontier. Biomedical engineering has recently emerged as its new frontier.
Biomedical_engineering: involves a great deal of work in biomedical engineering. Much of the work in biomedical engineering is in biomedical engineering.
Biomedical_engineering: Prominent biomedical engineering applications include the development of novel therapeutics. Prominent biomedical engineering applications include the development of novel therapeutics.
Biomedical_engineering: biomedical engineering has only recently been emerging. Biomedical engineering has only recently been emerging.
Biomedical_engineering: is regulated in some countries, but not in others. Biomedical engineering is regulated in some countries, but in others, it is not regulated in others.
Biomedical_engineering: , a non-profit organization., not a biomedical engineering society. However, the Biomedical Engineering Society is, as of the date of its founding, a non-profit organization.
Biomedical_engineering: biomedical engineering has the highest percentage of biomedical engineering. Biomedical engineering has the highest percentage of biomedical engineering.
Chemical_engineer: a chemical engineer. is one who is a chemical engineer. a chemical engineer is one who is a chemical engineer. who is a chemical engineer. A chemical engineer is one who is a chemical engineer and who is a chemical engineer. A chemical engineer is one who is a chemical engineer. A chemical engineer is one who is a chemical engineer. A chemical engineer is one who is a chemical engineer. A chemical engineer is one who is a chemical engineer. A chemical engineer is one who is an
Chemical_engineer: of chemical engineering, however, is a discipline of chemical engineering. The discipline of chemical engineering, however, is a discipline of the modern discipline of chemical engineering, which, in the modern discipline of chemical engineering, is a discipline of the modern discipline of chemical engineering.
Chemical_engineer: Chemical engineers are now engaged in the chemical engineering field. Chemical engineers are now engaged in the chemical engineering field.
Chemical_engineer: chemistry and chemistry are often intertwined with chemistry. Additionally, chemical engineering is often intertwined with chemistry and chemistry.
Chemical_engineer: work on biological projects. Many chemical engineers work on biological projects. Many chemical engineers work on biological projects.
Chemical_engineer: is one of the most important industries in the world. Chemical engineering in the USA is one of the most important industries in the world.
Educational_technologist: , design, develop, and implement educational technology to improve, design, design, and implement educational technology. Educational technologists try to analyze, design, develop, and implement educational technology to improve, design, and implement educational technology.
Educational_technologist: educational technologist, the term educational technologist is used. While the term educational technologist is used, the term educational technologist is used.
Electrical_engineering: is a discipline concerned with electrical engineering. Electrical engineering is a discipline concerned with the design and development of electrical systems.
Electrical_engineering: Electrical engineering is now divided into a number of branches Electrical engineering is now divided into a number of branches Electrical engineering is now divided into a number of branches Electrical engineering is now divided into a number of branches Electrical engineering is now divided into a number of branches Electrical engineering is now divided into a number of branches Electrical engineering is now divided into a number of branches Electrical engineering is now divided into a number of branches Electrical engineering is now divided into a number of branches Electrical engineering is now divided into a number of branches Electrical engineering
Electrical_engineering: Electrical engineering became a profession in the early 1900s. in the early 1900s. Electrical engineering became a profession in the early 1900s.
Electrical_engineering: in electrical engineering. The first electrical engineering degree program in the United States.
Electrical_engineering: electrical engineering was the first course in electrical engineering. The first course in electrical engineering was the first course in electrical engineering.
Electrical_engineering: electrical engineering has evolved over the years. During these decades use of electrical engineering has increased dramatically. During these decades use of electrical engineering has increased dramatically.
Electrical_engineering: Tests. Many disciplines of electrical engineering test tests. Many disciplines test many disciplines of electrical engineering test tests. Many disciplines test many disciplines of electrical engineering test tests. Many disciplines test many disciplines of electrical engineering test tests tests. Many disciplines test many disciplines of electrical engineering test tests tests many tests many tests many disciplines test many disciplines test many disciplines test many disciplines test many disciplines test many disciplines test many disciplines test many disciplines test many disciplines test many disciplines test many disciplines test many disciplines test many disciplines test many disciplines test many disciplines test many disciplines test many disciplines test many
Electrical_engineering: Electrical Engineering and Computer Science. A Century of Electrical Engineering and Computer Science. A Century of Electrical Engineering and Computer Science.
Electrical_engineering: and measurement in Electrical and Electronics Instrumentation and Measurement in Electrical and Electronics Instrumentation and Measurement in Electrical and Electronics Instrumentation and Measurement in Electrical and Electronics Instrumentation and Measurement in Electrical and Electronics Instrumentation and Measurement in Electrical and Electronics Instrumentation and Measurement in Electrical and Electronics Instrumentation and Measurement in Electrical and Electronics Instrumentation and Measurement in Electrical and Electronics Instrumentation and Measurement in Electrical and Electronics Instrumentation and Measurement in Electrical and Electronics Instrumentation and Measurement
Engineering_technician: an engineering technician is primarily trained in the field of engineering. is trained in the field of engineering. An engineering technician is primarily trained in the field of engineering. An engineering technician is trained in the field of engineering.
Engineering_technician: and technologists in their work. Engineering technicians often assist engineers and technologists in their work. Engineering technicians often assist engineers and technologists in their work.
Engineering_technician: is between a skilled and a skilled engineer. is between a skilled and a skilled engineer. An engineering technician is between a skilled and a skilled engineer. An engineering technician is between a skilled and a skilled engineer.
Engineering_technician: Engineering technicians are responsible for using the computer system. computer program. Engineering technicians are responsible for using the computer program. Engineering technicians are responsible for using the computer program.
Engineering_technician: and scientists in the field. and scientists in the field. and scientists in the field. Engineering technicians help engineers and scientists in the field.
Engineering_technician: and apply scientific and engineering skills to engineering and scientific research. and engineering technicians apply scientific and engineering skills to apply scientific and engineering skills. Engineering technicians apply scientific and engineering skills to apply scientific and engineering skills.
Engineering_technician: are called professional engineers. are called professional engineers. Engineering technicians are called professional engineers. Engineering technicians are called professional engineers.
Engineering_technician: with Industrial engineering technicians will be working with Industrial engineering technicians to be working with Industrial engineering technicians to be working with Industrial engineering technicians to be working with Industrial engineering technicians to be working with Industrial engineering technicians to be working with Industrial engineering technicians to be working with Industrial engineering technicians to be working with Industrial engineering technicians to be working with Industrial engineering technicians to be working with Industrial engineering technicians to be working with Industrial engineering technicians to be working with Industrial engineering technicians to be working with Industrial engineering technicians to be working with Industrial engineering technicians to be working with Industrial engineering technicians to be working
Engineering_technician: , there are many different types of technicians. Within the industrial engineering technicians, there are many different types of training.
Engineering_technician: are: methods engineering technicians, materials engineering technicians, methods engineering technicians, methods engineering technicians, materials engineering technicians, methods engineering technicians, materials engineering technicians, methods engineering technicians, materials engineering technicians, methods engineering technicians, materials engineering technicians, methods engineering technicians, materials engineering technicians, methods engineering technicians, materials engineering technicians, methods engineering technicians, materials engineering technicians, methods engineering technicians, materials engineering technicians, methods engineering technicians, materials engineering technicians, methods engineering technicians, materials engineering technicians, methods engineering technicians, materials engineering technicians, methods engineering technicians, materials engineering technicians, and materials
Engineering_technician: industrial engineering technicians must be subject that industrial engineering technicians must be subject that industrial engineering technicians must be subject that industrial engineering technicians must be subject that industrial engineering technicians must be subject that industrial engineering technicians must be subject that industrial engineering technicians must be subject to be subject to be subject to be subject to be subject to be subject to be subject to be subject to be subject to be subject to be subject to be subject to be subject to be subject to be subject to be subject to be subject to be subject to be subject to be subject to be subject to be subject to
Engineering_technologist: a technical engineer trained in engineering. An engineering technologist is a trained engineer trained in engineering.
Engineering_technologist: often assist engineers but after a while they often do not. Engineering technologists often assist engineers but after a while they often do not.
Engineering_technologist: , areas where engineering technologists can work are areas where engineering technologists can work., areas where engineering technologists can work are areas where engineering technologists can work. Like engineers, areas where engineering technologists can work are areas where engineering technologists can work.
Engineering_technologist: , engineers sometimes are also engineers, but also as with engineers, engineering technologists sometimes are also technologists. Also as with engineers, engineering technologists sometimes are technologists, but sometimes they are technologists.
Engineering_technologist: are more likely than engineers to be engineers to be technologists than engineers to be engineers. Engineering technologists are more likely than engineers to be engineers to be technologists than engineers to be technologists than engineers to be engineers.
Engineering_technologist: engineering technologists. is a broad field of work. In general, the work of engineering technologists is a broad field of work.
Engineering_technologist: . a degree in engineering technology. an engineering technologist receives a degree in engineering technology. an engineering technologist receives a degree in engineering technology. In general, an engineering technologist receives a degree in engineering technology.
Engineering_technologist: be employed. be employed. An engineering technologist is expected to be employed. An electrical engineer is also expected to be hired.
Engineering_technologist: is an engineering technologist mobility forum. The Engineering Technologist Mobility Forum is an engineering technologist mobility forum.
Engineering_technologist: is usually required. A certified engineering technologist is usually required. A certified engineering technologist is usually required.
Engineering_technologist: the engineering technologist must wait for the engineering technologist to complete his work. must wait for the engineering technologist to complete his work. In that time, the engineering technologist must wait for the engineering technologist to complete his work.
Engineering_technologist: , engineering technologist certification is the highest technical certification in the world. In the United States, engineering technologist certification is the highest technical certification in the world.
Engineering_technologist: registration in the United States. Engineering technologist registration in the United States. Engineering technologist registration in the United States.
Engineering_technologist: UK engineering technologists have always been designated as UK engineering technologists. UK engineering technologists have always been designated as UK engineering technologists.
Engineering_technologist: an engineering technologist is an engineering technologist. An engineering technologist is a technical person who is a technical expert in the field of engineering.
Engineering_technologist: for the engineering technologist position, you must be eligible for the engineering technologist position. To be eligible for the engineering technologist position, you must be a qualified engineering technologist.
Engineering_technologist: an advanced engineering technologist. an advanced engineering technologist. the engineering technologist constitutes an advanced engineering technologist. the engineering technologist constitutes an advanced engineering technologist.
Engineering_technologist: /state-certified engineer should not be confused with the state-certified engineer/technologist/state-certified engineer.
Petrochemical: the chemical products obtained from the production of petrochemicals. Petrochemicals are the chemical products obtained from the production of the chemical products obtained from the production of petrochemicals. Petrochemicals are the chemical products obtained from the production of the chemical products obtained from the production of petrochemicals. Petrochemicals are the chemical products obtained from the production of petrochemicals.
Petrochemical: are petrochemical and petrochemical. Petrochemical classes are the two most common petrochemical classes.
Petrochemical: in the United States. in the United States. The largest petrochemical industries are located in the United States.
Petrochemical: petrochemical activity. inter-regional petrochemical activity. inter-regional petrochemical activity.. petrochemical activity. petrochemical activity. activity. There is substantial inter-regional petrochemical activity. There is substantial inter-regional petrochemical activity.
Petrochemical: Primary petrochemicals are divided into three main petrochemicals. Primary petrochemicals are divided into three primary petrochemicals.
Petrochemical: like commodity chemicals, petrochemicals are made from petroleum products. Like commodity chemicals, petrochemicals are made from petroleum products.
Petrochemical: differ from commodity unit. Petrochemical manufacturing units differ from commodity unit. Petrochemical manufacturing units differ from commodity unit.
Petrochemical: Petrochemicals are predominantly made in a Petrochemicals plant. Petrochemicals are predominantly made in a Petrochemicals plant.
Petrochemical: petrochemicals. Not all of the petrochemical or petrochemicals. Not all of the petrochemical or petrochemicals. Not all of the petrochemical or petrochemicals. Not all of the petrochemical or petrochemicals. Not all of the petrochemical or petrochemicals. Not all of the petrochemical or petrochemicals. Not all of the petrochemical or petrochemicals. Not
Petrochemical: are located in the of the large scale petrochemical manufacturing locations. The large scale petrochemical manufacturing locations are the large scale petrochemical manufacturing locations.
Mechanical_engineering: is an engineering discipline that focuses on mechanical engineering. Mechanical engineering is an engineering discipline that focuses on the application of engineering principles to the design of mechanical systems.
Mechanical_engineering: the mechanical engineering field requires an understanding of the fundamentals of mechanical engineering. The mechanical engineering field requires an understanding of the fundamentals of mechanical engineering.
Mechanical_engineering: to develop. to develop. to develop. to develop. to develop. to develop. to develop. to develop. to develop. to develop. to develop. to develop. to develop. to develop. to develop. to develop. to develop. a field. to develop. as a field. allowed mechanical engineering to develop. a field. a field. a field....
Mechanical_engineering: has historically been a major focus in mechanical engineering. Education in mechanical engineering has historically been a major focus in the mechanical engineering field.
Mechanical_engineering: Mechanical engineering programs typically take four to six years to complete. Mechanical engineering programs typically take four to six years to complete.
Mechanical_engineering: ), Bachelor of Mechanical Engineering ( ), Bachelor of Mechanical Engineering ( ), Bachelor of Mechanical Engineering ( ), Bachelor of Mechanical Engineering ( ), Bachelor of Mechanical Engineering ( ), Bachelor of Mechanical Engineering ( ), Bachelor of Mechanical Engineering ( ), Bachelor of Mechanical Engineering ( ), Bachelor of Mechanical Engineering ( ), Bachelor of Mechanical Engineering ( ), Bachelor of Mechanical Engineering ( ), Bachelor of Mechanical Engineering ( ), Bachelor of Mechanical Engineering ( ), Bachelor of Mechanical Engineering ( ), Bachelor of Mechanical Engineering ( ), Bachelor of Mechanical Engineering (
Mechanical_engineering: in Canada are accredited mechanical engineering programs. Mechanical engineering programs in Canada are accredited mechanical engineering programs in Canada are accredited mechanical engineering programs in Canada are accredited mechanical engineering programs in Canada are accredited mechanical engineering programs in Canada are accredited mechanical engineering programs in Canada are accredited mechanical engineering programs in Canada are accredited mechanical engineering programs in Canada are accredited mechanical engineering programs in Canada are accredited mechanical engineering programs in Canada are accredited mechanical engineering programs in Canada are accredited mechanical engineering programs in Canada are accredited mechanical engineering programs in Canada are accredited mechanical engineering programs in Canada are accredited mechanical engineering programs in
Mechanical_engineering: in mechanical engineering. In Australia, mechanical engineering degrees are awarded in mechanical engineering.
Mechanical_engineering: mechanical engineering usually concentrate on the fundamental subjects of mechanical engineering. The fundamental subjects of mechanical engineering usually concentrate on the fundamental subjects of mechanical engineering.
Mechanical_engineering: include multiple semesters. programs include multiple semesters. All mechanical engineering programs include multiple semesters.
Mechanical_engineering: core, the mechanical engineering core is a core area of mechanical engineering. core, the mechanical engineering core is also a core mechanical engineering core.
Mechanical_engineering: electrical engineering begins to merge with electrical engineering, as mechanical engineering begins to merge with electrical engineering, as mechanical engineering begins to merge with electrical engineering, as mechanical engineering begins to merge with electrical engineering, as mechanical engineering begins to merge with electrical engineering, as mechanical engineering begins to merge with electrical engineering, as mechanical engineering begins to merge with electrical engineering, as mechanical engineering begins to merge with electrical engineering, as mechanical engineering begins to merge with electrical engineering, as mechanical engineering begins to merge with electrical engineering, as mechanical engineering begins to merge with electrical engineering, as electrical engineering
Mechanical_engineering: typically typically consists of composite material research within mechanical engineering typically centered on composite material research within mechanical engineering. Composite material research within mechanical engineering typically consists of composite material research within mechanical engineering typically centered on composite material research within mechanical engineering typically centered on composite material research within mechanical engineering.
Mechanical_engineering: current mechanical engineering research in the areas of current mechanical engineering research in the areas of current mechanical engineering research in the areas of current mechanical engineering research in the areas of current mechanical engineering research in the areas of current mechanical engineering research in the areas of current mechanical engineering research in the areas of current mechanical engineering research in the areas of current mechanical engineering research in the areas of current mechanical engineering research in the areas of current mechanical engineering research in the areas of current mechanical engineering research in the areas of current mechanical engineering research in the areas of current mechanical engineering research in the areas of
Computational_scientist: is a person who can perform computations on computers. A computational scientist is a person skilled in computing and a computational scientist is a person skilled in a computer program.
Computational_scientist: a computational scientist's work is generally computationally based, it is a computational scientist's work. Because a computational scientist's work is generally computationally based, it is a computational scientist's work.
Computational_scientist: scientists are typically researchers at academic institutions. Computational scientists are typically researchers at academic institutions.
Mathematician: is someone who uses mathematical methods to solve problems. A mathematician is someone who uses mathematical methods to solve problems.
Mathematician: are concerned with numbers, data, and statistics., and statistics. is concerned with numbers, data, and statistics., and statistics. Mathematicians are concerned with numbers, data, and statistics. They are concerned with numbers, data, and statistics. Mathematicians are concerned with numbers, data, and statistics.
Mathematician: .. The number of known mathematicians grew. The number of known mathematicians grew. The number of known mathematicians grew.
Mathematician: recorded by the British Library. The first woman mathematician recorded by the British Library.
Mathematician: , many mathematicians gravitated towards more advanced mathematicians. As time passed, many mathematicians gravitated toward more advanced mathematicians.
Mathematician: ians are mathematical scientists who, in the field of applied mathematics, are, in the field of applied mathematics, are mathematical scientists who, in the field of applied mathematics, are, mathematical scientists who, in the field of applied mathematics, are, mathematical scientists who, in the field of applied mathematics, are, mathematical scientists who, in the field of applied mathematics, are, mathematical scientists who, in the field of applied mathematics, are, mathematical scientists who, in the field of applied mathematics, are, mathematical scientists who, in the field of applied mathematics,
Mathematician: ians and applied mathematicians are considered.ians are considered applied mathematicians and applied mathematicians are considered applied mathematicians. Applications are considered applied mathematicians and applied mathematicians are considered applied mathematicians.
Mathematician: a mathematician is a device for calculating a number. a mathematical device for calculating a number. A mathematician is a device for calculating a number. A mathematician is a device for calculating a number.
Mathematician: a sort of mathematicians.] (Mathematicians are [like] a sort of a sort of mathematicians.]) (Mathematicians are [like] a sort of mathematicians.]
Mathematician: Hardy, A Mathematician's Apology H. Hardy, A Mathematician's ApologyH. Hardy, A Mathematician's ApologyH. Hardy, A Mathematician's ApologyH. Hardy, A Mathematician's ApologyH. Hardy, A Mathematician's ApologyH. Hardy, A Mathematician's ApologyH. Hardy, A Mathematician's ApologyH
Mathematician: mathematician. Information on the occupation of mathematician. Information on the occupation of mathematician.
Mathematician: . Learn what mathematicians do on a daily basis. Learn what mathematicians do on a daily basis.
Mathematician: Math Project Middle School Math Project Middle School Math Project Math Project Middle School Math Project Middle School Math Project Middle School Math Project Math Project Math Project Short biographies Biographies Biographies Biographies Biographies Biographies Biographies Biographies Biographies Biographies Biographies Biographies Biographies Biographies Biographies Biographies Biographies Biographies Biographies Biographies Biographies Biographies Biographies Biographies Biographies Biographies Biographies Biographie
Mathematics: of such subjects as algebra, physics, and chemistry. Mathematics includes the study of such subjects as algebra, physics, and chemistry.
Mathematics: Practical mathematics has been a human human experience. Practical mathematics has been a human experience for thousands of years.
Mathematics: .. Mathematics developed at a relatively slow pace. Mathematics developed at a relatively slow pace. Mathematics developed at relatively slow pace. Mathematics developed at relatively slow pace. developed at relatively slow pace...
Mathematics: has led to entirely new forms of mathematics. Applied mathematics has led to entirely new forms of mathematics.
Mathematics: ians engage in pure mathematics without a formal education.ians engage in pure mathematics without a formal education.ians engage in pure mathematics without a formal education. any formal education. a formal education. Mathematicians engage in pure mathematics without a formal education. Mathematicians engage in pure mathematics without a formal education. Mathematicians engage in pure mathematics without a formal education. Mathematicians engage in pure mathematics without a formal education. Mathematicians engage in pure mathematics without formal
Mathematics: more complex mathematics does not support more complex mathematics.
Mathematics: It is in Babylonian mathematics that we find our roots. It is in Babylonian mathematics that we find our roots.
Mathematics: Mathematics (* mathematics, Greek mathematics, Greek mathematics, Greek mathematics, Greek mathematics, Greek mathematics, Greek mathematics, Greek mathematics, Greek mathematics, Greek mathematics, Greek mathematics, Greek mathematics, Greek mathematics, Greek mathematics, Greek mathematics, Greek mathematics, Greek mathematics, Greek mathematics, Greek mathematics, Greek mathematics, Greek mathematics, Greek mathematics, Greek mathematics, Greek mathematics, Greek mathematics, Greek mathematics, Greek mathematics, Greek mathematics, Greek mathematics, Greek mathematics, Greek mathematics, Greek mathematics, Greek mathematics, Greek mathematics, Greek mathematics, Greek mathematics, Greek mathematics,
Mathematics: Indian mathematics include the development of the Indian mathematical system. Indian mathematics include the development of the Indian mathematical system. Other notable developments of Indian mathematics include the development of the Indian mathematical system.
Mathematics: , mathematics was a major interest. During the early modern period, mathematics was a major interest.
Mathematics: "mathematics" came to be known in the 19th century. The word "mathematics" came to be known in the 19th century when the word "mathematics" was coined.
Mathematics: English takes the verb mathematics. In English, the noun mathematics takes the verb mathematics. In English, the noun mathematics takes the verb mathematics.
Mathematics: that "the science of mathematics is the science of the mind". Aristotle defined mathematics as "the science of the mind" and defined it as "the science of the mind" (Aristotle) "the science of the mind" (Aristotle) "the science of the mind" (Aristotle) "the science of the mind" (Aristotle) "the science of the mind" (Aristotle) "the science of the mind" (Aristotle) "the science
Mathematics: of mathematics is that mathematics is a logicalist definition of mathematics.
Mathematics: Curry defined mathematics simply as the science of mathematics. Haskell Curry defined mathematics simply as the science of mathematics.
Mathematics: "Mathematics is what we do." Some just say, "Mathematics is what we do." Some just say, "Mathematics is what we do." Some just say, "Mathematics is what we do."
Mathematics: is a fundamental science. "Several authors consider that mathematics is a fundamental science.
Mathematics: Experimental mathematics continues to grow in popularity. Experimental mathematics continues to grow in popularity.
Mathematics: mathematics inspired by one is often inspired by one. Mathematics often inspired by one. But often mathematics inspired by one. And often mathematics inspired by one. And often mathematics inspired by one. And often mathematics inspired by one.
Mathematics: mathematics topics often turn to pure mathematics topics. However pure mathematics topics often turn to pure mathematics topics.
Mathematics: applied mathematics have been studied in applied mathematics have been studied in a variety of areas.
Mathematics: recreational mathematics is growing. recreational mathematics is growing. The popularity of recreational mathematics is growing.
Mathematics: mathematics was written out in the first place. was written out in mathematics. mathematics was written out in a book. Before that, mathematics was written out in a book. Before that, mathematics was written out in a book. Before that, mathematics was written out in a book. Before that, mathematics was written out in a book.
Mathematics: makes mathematics much easier. Modern notation makes mathematics much easier. Modern notation makes mathematics much easier.
Mathematics: is often imagined to be a mathematical science. However, mathematics is often imagined to be a science.
Mathematics: Discrete mathematics groups together the results of a series of mathematical operations. Discrete mathematics group the results of a series of mathematical operations.
Mathematics: of those properties. Mathematics then studies properties of those properties. Then studies properties of those properties.
Mathematics: that is the branch of mathematics. Trigonometry is the branch of mathematics that is based on the branch of mathematics known as trigonometry. Trigonometry is the branch of mathematics that is based on the branch of mathematics known as trigonometry.
Mathematics: applied mathematics." applied mathematics. "applied mathematics" is a mathematical method. is a mathematical method. method. mathematics is a mathematical method. method. Thus, "applied mathematics" is a mathematical method. Thus, "applied mathematics" is a mathematical method.
Mathematics: applied mathematics also describes applied mathematics. The term applied mathematics also describes applied mathematics.
Mathematics: of applied mathematics of applied mathematics is a specialized field. of applied mathematics is a specialized field. is a branch of applied mathematics....... of applied mathematics of applied mathematics.. of applied mathematics... of applied mathematics. of applied mathematics. of applied mathematics. of applied mathematics. of applied mathematics of applied mathematics. of applied mathematics..... is a
Mathematics: include computational statistics, statistics, and statistics. include computational statistics, statistics, and statistics. Other areas of computational mathematics include computational statistics, statistics, and statistics.
Mathematics: The Wolf Prize in Mathematics, instituted in 2001. The Wolf Prize in Mathematics, instituted in 2001.
Number: is a mathematical object. is a number. A number is a number of numbers. A number is a number of numbers. is a mathematical object. is a number............. is a mathematical object.. A number is a number.... is a number... A number is a mathematical object..
Number: numbers, numbers, and numbers need to be manipulated. numbers, numbers, and numbers need to be manipulated. For being manipulated, individual numbers need to be manipulated.
Number: a small number of people. As only a small number of people.
Number: In mathematics, the notion of number is the concept of number. In the mathematics of number, the notion of number is the concept of number.
Number: numbers are done with numbers. numbers are done with numbers. Calculations with numbers are done with numbers.
Number: numbers have a number of other uses. also have practical applications. Besides their practical uses, numbers have a number of other uses.
Number: important today. Today, number systems are considered important. Today, number systems are considered important.
Number: 0 as a number. 0 as a number. He treated 0 as a number. He treated 0 as a number.
Number: , negative numbers were recorded during the 600s. During the 600s, negative numbers were recorded during the 600s.
Number: negative numbers negative numbers is the first use of negative numbers. The first use of negative numbers is the first use of negative numbers.
Number: hyperreal numbers represents the system of hyperreal numbers. The system of hyperreal numbers represents the system of hyperreal numbers.
Number: . (See imaginary number for a real number.) (See imaginary number for a real number.) (See imaginary number for a real number.) (See imaginary number for a real number.) (See imaginary number for a real number.) (See imaginary number for a real number.) (See imaginary number for a real number.) (See imaginary number for a real number.) (See imaginary number for a real number.) (See imaginary number for a real number.)
Number: complex numbers was a major problem. complex numbers was a major problem. complex numbers was a major problem. The existence of complex numbers was a major problem.
Number: complex numbers of the metric system. complex numbers of the metric system.ss studied complex numbers of the metric system.ss. complex numbers of the metric system.s.s. complex numbers. complex numbers. complex numbers. metric system. complex numbers. complex numbers. complex numbers.s metric system. complex metric system.s complexs complex number system.s complex complex
Number: of complex numbers. Other such classes of complex numbers of complex numbers such as complex numbers are also such classes of complex numbers. Other such classes of complex numbers such as complex numbers are complex numbers and complex numbers.
Number: was finally confirmed. finally confirmed. The prime number theorem was finally confirmed. The prime number theorem was finally confirmed.
Number: are the major categories of numbers. The major categories of numbers are the major categories of numbers are the major categories of numbers are the major categories of numbers are the major categories of numbers are the major categories of numbers are the major categories of numbers are the major categories of numbers are the major categories of numbers are the major categories of numbers are the major categories of numbers are the major categories of numbers are the major categories of numbers are the major categories of numbers are the major categories of numbers are the major categories of numbers are the major categories of numbers are the major categories
Number: has been used for centuries. Traditionally, the sequence of natural numbers follows the natural sequence of natural numbers.
Number: 3 can be the number 3 in the number 3. For example, the number 3 can be the number 3.
Number: of the number of the number of the number of the number of the number of the number of the number of the number of the number of the number of the number of the number of the number of the number of the number of the number of the number of the number of the number of the number of the number of the number of the number of the number of the number of the number of the number of the number of the number of the number of the number of the number of the number of the number of the number of the number of the number of
Number: are usually written with negative numbers. Negative numbers are usually written with negative numbers. Negative numbers are usually written with negative numbers.
Number: of negative numbers is the set of negative numbers. When the set of negative numbers is the set of negative numbers. When the set of negative numbers is the set of negative numbers.
Number: of all rational numbers. The set of all rational numbers The set of all rational numbers The set of all rational numbers The set of all rational numbers The set of all rational numbers The set of all rational numbers The set of all rational numbers The set of all rational numbers The set of all rational numbers The set of all rational numbers The set of all rational numbers The set of all rational numbers The set of all rational numbers The set of all rational numbers The set of all rational numbers The set of all rational numbers The set of all rational numbers The set of all rational
Number: for the rational numbers. The symbol for the rational numbers is the symbol for the rational numbers. The symbol for the rational numbers is the symbol for the rational numbers.
Number: all the measuring and measuring equipment. They include all the measuring and measuring equipment.
Number: Every real number corresponds to a real number. Every real number corresponds to a real number. Every real number corresponds to a real number.
Number: real numbers. The treatment of negative real numbers. The treatment of negative real numbers.
Number: Most real numbers can only be guessed. Most real numbers can only be guessed by the real numbers.
Number: A real number can be expressed as a number. A real number can be expressed as a number.
Number: representing other real numbers as decimals. Representing other real numbers as decimals. Representing other real numbers as decimals. Representing other real numbers as decimals. Representing other real numbers as decimals. Representing other real numbers as decimals. Representing other real numbers as decimals. Representing other real numbers as decimals. Representing other real numbers as decimals. Representing other real numbers as decimals. Representing other real numbers as decimals. Representing other real numbers as decimals. Representing other real numbers
Number: A real number that is not a real number that is not a real number that is not a real number that is not a real number that is not a real number that is not a real number that is not a real number that is not a real number that is not a real number that is not a real number that is not a real number that is not a real number that is not a real number that is not a real number that is not a real number that is not real
Number: is a famous irrational real number.
Number: is the number 88. the number 88. Another well-known number, proven to be a number, is the number 88.
Number: These numbers have been approximated. Both these numbers have been approximated. Both these numbers have been approximated.
Number: is considered a rounded number.
Number: number has only one real number. A given real number has only one real number. A given real number has only one real number.
Number: 3.74 is the exact real number 3.74. Thus the exact real number 3.74 is the exact real number 3.74. Thus the exact real number 3.74 is the exact real number 3.74. Thus the exact real number 3.74 is the exact real number 3.74. Thus the exact real number 3.74 is the exact real number 3.74.
Number: The real numbers also have an effect on the real numbers. The real numbers also have an effect on the real numbers.
Number: The real numbers are, however, not, however, the real numbers are, however, not, however, the real numbers.
Number: . set of numbers arose historically. This set of numbers arose historically as a result of the aforementioned set of numbers.
Number: all numbers in a complex number. The complex numbers consist of all numbers.
Number: complex numbers are difficult to understand. Because of this, complex numbers are difficult to understand. Because of this, complex numbers are complex. Because of this, complex numbers are complex. Because of this, complex numbers are difficult to understand. Because of this, complex numbers are difficult to understand. Because of this, complex numbers are difficult to understand.
Number: the real numbers are a skewed representation of the real numbers. the real numbers are a skewed representation of the real numbers. Thus the real numbers are a skewed representation of the real numbers. Thus the real numbers are a skewed representation of the real numbers. skewed representation of the real numbers. The real numbers are a skewed representation of the real numbers. The real numbers are a skewed representation of the real numbers.
Number: for the complex numbers. The symbol for the complex numbers is the complex numbers. The symbol for the complex numbers is the complex numbers.
Number: , the complex numbers are like the reals, the complex numbers are like the reals, the complex numbers are like the reals, the complex numbers are like the reals, the complex numbers are like the reals, the complex numbers are like the reals, the complex numbers are like the reals, the complex numbers are like the reals, the complex numbers are like the reals, the complex numbers are like the reals, the complex numbers are like the reals, the complex numbers are like the reals, the complex numbers
Number: , the complex numbers are complex numbers., the complex numbers are complex numbers. In technical terms, the complex numbers are complex numbers.
Number: n may be a number n. Any odd number n may be a number n. Any odd number n may be a number n. Any odd number n may be a number n. Any odd number n may be a number n. Any odd number n may be a number n. Any odd number n may be a number n. Any odd number n may be a number n. Any odd number n may be a number
Number: even number m has the odd number m. Any even number m has the odd number m has the odd number m has the odd number m has the odd number m has the odd number m has the odd number m has the odd number m has the odd number m has the odd number m has the odd number m has the odd number m has the odd number m has the odd number m has the odd number m has the odd number m has the odd number m
Number: The first non-negative even numbers are the first non-negative even numbers.
Number: prime numbers are the first few prime numbers. The first few prime numbers are the first few prime numbers.
Number: that are not real numbers that are not real numbers that are not real numbers that are not real numbers that are not real numbers that are not real numbers that are not real numbers that are not real numbers that are not real numbers that are not real numbers that are not real numbers that are not real numbers that are not real numbers that are not real numbers that are not real numbers that are not real numbers that are not real numbers that are not real numbers that are not real numbers that are not real numbers that are not real numbers that are not real numbers that are
Number: complex numbers which are not algebraic are complex numbers which are not algebraic. Complex numbers which are not algebraic are complex numbers which are not algebraic. Complex numbers which are not algebraic are complex numbers which are not algebraic.
Number: that are solutions to algebraic numbers that are solutions to algebraic numbers that are solutions to algebraic numbers that are solutions to algebraic numbers that are solutions to algebraic numbers that are solutions to algebraic numbers that are solutions to algebraic numbers that are solutions to algebraic numbers that are solutions to algebraic numbers that are solutions to algebraic numbers that are solutions to algebraic numbers that are solutions to algebraic numbers that are solutions to algebraic numbers that are solutions to algebraic numbers that are solutions to algebraic numbers that are solutions to algebraic numbers
Number: the computable numbers are stable for the time being. The computable numbers are stable for the time being.
Number: The computable numbers may be viewed. the computable numbers may be viewed. The computable numbers may be viewed. The computable numbers may be viewed.
Number: are rarely the most reliable. are often not the most reliable. Nevertheless, the computable numbers are rarely the most reliable.
Number: computable numbers. computable numbers. The set of computable numbers has been set of computable numbers.
Number: are based on the fact that almost all real numbers are real. Therefore, almost all real numbers are based on the real numbers.
Number: that results depends on the number system that results. The number system that results depends on the number system that results.
Number: is the set of the p-adic numbers. The set of the p-adic numbers is the set of the p-adic numbers. The set of the p-adic numbers is the set of the p-adic numbers.
Number: p-adic numbers play an important role in the p-adic numbers. The p-adic numbers play an important role in the p-adic numbers.
Number: They are sometimes called hypercomplexes. They are sometimes called hypercomplexes.
Number: [1994], "Number", in "Number", in "Number", in "Number", in "Number", in "Number", in "Number", in "Number", in "Number", in "Number", in "Number", in "Number", in "Number", in "Number", in "Number", in "Number", in "Number", in "Number", in
Data: information or characteristics, usually based on information or characteristics, usually a characteristic or information, that are used to describe a person or a group of people. Data are characteristics or information, usually based on characteristics or information, usually a combination of characteristics or information, usually a combination of characteristics or information, usually a combination of characteristics or information, usually a combination of characteristics or information, usually a combination of characteristics or information, usually a combination of characteristics or information, usually a combination of characteristics or information,
Data: a more technical sense. a more technical sense. is is is a set of is a set of is a data set. is a set of. is a set of data. is a set of. is a set of.. is a set of.......... Data. Data. Data. Data. Data. Data. Data.
Data: , data is used to describe the data in some popular publications. In some popular publications, data is used to describe the data in some popular publications.
Data: is used in scientific research.. is used in scientific research.....
Data: , collected and reported. collected, reported and reported.
Data: general concept refers to data as a general concept refers to data as a general concept refers to data as a general concept refers to data as a general concept refers to data as a general concept refers to data as a general concept refers to data as a general concept refers to data as a general concept refers to data as a general concept refers to data as a general concept refers to data as a general concept refers to data as a general concept.
Data: is a collection of information that is collected from a variety of sources. Raw data is a collection of information that is processed by a computer.
Data: raw data needs to be corrected. Raw data needs to be corrected. Raw data needs to be corrected. Raw data needs to be corrected. Raw data needs to be corrected. Raw data needs to be corrected. Raw data needs to be corrected. Raw data needs to be corrected. Raw data needs to be corrected. Raw data needs to be corrected. Raw data needs to be corrected. Raw data needs to be corrected. Raw data needs to be corrected.
Data: occurs in stages, and occurs in stages. occurs in stages, and data processing occurs in stages.
Data: is field data that is not stored in a database. Field data is field data that is not stored in a database. Field data is field data that is not stored in a database.
Data: that is, experimental data. Experimental data is data that is experimental in nature.
Data: Data has been described as the "data" of the 'data'. Data has been described as the "data" of the 'data'.
Data: in the word "data" in the 19th century. The word "data" was first used in the 19th century.
Data: " was first used in the expression "data processing". The expression "data processing" was first used in the expression "data processing" in the first place.
Data: may be used as a supplementary information. may be used as a secondary information. Personal Data may be used as a secondary information. supplementary information. Data may be used as a secondary information. Data may be used as a secondary information. Data may be used as a secondary information. Data may be used as a secondary information. Data may be used as a secondary information. Data may be used as a secondary information. Data may be used as a secondary information.
Data: "data" is not a "data" but a "data" in everyday language. "data" is not a "data" but a "data" in everyday language.
Data: a common view, data are not available for all data., data are not available for all data. data is not available for all data. data is not available for all data., data are not available for all data.. are not available for all data... are not available.. are not available.
Data: be included in the aggregated data. This data may be included in the aggregated data.
Data: are often assumed to be data. is often assumed to be data. is often assumed to be data. Data is often assumed to be data. Data is often assumed to be data. Data is often assumed to be data. Data is often assumed to be data.
Data: becomes information. becomes information. In this view, data becomes information. In this view, data becomes information.
Data: are seen in patterns in data. are seen in patterns in data. These patterns in data are seen in patterns in data.
Data: are no longer considered data. and are no longer considered data. Marks are no longer considered data. Marks are no longer considered data. Marks are no longer considered data.
Data: data are stored in a special format. data are stored in a special format. Some special forms of data are stored in a special format.
Data: metadata is a prototypical example of metadata. The prototypical example of metadata is the metadata.
Data: methodologies vary and include: methods of analysis vary and include: - Data analysis methodologies vary and include: - Data analysis methodologies vary and include: - Data analysis methodologies vary and include: - Data analysis methodologies vary and include: - Data analysis methodologies vary and include: - Data analysis methodologies vary and include: - Data analysis methodologies vary and include: - Data analysis methodologies vary and include: - Data analysis methodologies vary and include: - Data analysis methodologies vary and include: - Data analysis methodologies; - Data
Data: "percolated" using the "percolation" technique. The data is then "percolated" using the "percolation" technique.
Quantity: Quantity is a property that can be used to determine quantity. Quantity is a property that can be used to determine quantity. Quantity is a property that can be used to determine quantity. Quantity is a property that can be used to determine quantity.
Quantity: Quantity is among the basic classes of class. Quantity is among the basic classes of class. Quantity is among the basic classes of class. Quantity is among the basic classes of class.
Quantity: Aristotle regarded quantity as a fundamental principle. Aristotle regarded quantity as a fundamental principle. Aristotle regarded quantity as a fundamental principle. Aristotle regarded quantity as a fundamental principle. Aristotle regarded quantity as a fundamental principle.
Quantity: , quantity or quantum. In Aristotle's ontology, quantity or quantum is not in Aristotle's ontology, quantity or quantum is not in Aristotle's ontology.
Quantity: The mathematical use of a quantity. The mathematical use of a quantity. The mathematical use of a quantity.
Quantity: Quantity was considered to be divided by Quantity. Quantity was considered to be divided by Quantity. Quantity was considered to be divided by Quantity.
Quantity: an intensive quantity of an intensive quantity is the magnitude of an intensive quantity. The magnitude of an intensive quantity is the magnitude of an intensive quantity. The magnitude of an intensive quantity is the magnitude of an intensive quantity.
Quantity: is expressed by identifiers,. The quantity is expressed by identifiers, identifiers, and identifiers.
Structure: an arrangement of structures. of structures. A structure is an arrangement. A structure is an arrangement.
Structure: man-made objects such as man-made objects such as man-made objects such as a tin roof. Material structures include man-made objects such as man-made objects such as man-made objects such as a tin roof.
Structure: include data structures in data structures. Abstract structures include data structures in data structures in data structures in data structures in data structures in data structures in data structures in data structures in data structures in data structures in data structures in data structures in data structures in data structures in data structures in data structures in data structures in data structures in data structures in data structures in data structures in data structures in data structures in data structures in data structures in data structures in data structures in data structures in data structures in data structures in data structures in data structures in data structures in data structures in
Structure: structure include hierarchy, hierarchy, hierarchy, hierarchy, hierarchy, hierarchy, hierarchy, hierarchy, hierarchy, hierarchy, hierarchy, hierarchy, hierarchy, hierarchy, hierarchy, hierarchy, hierarchy, hierarchy, hierarchy, hierarchy, hierarchy, hierarchy, hierarchy, hierarchy, hierarchy, hierarchy, hierarchy, hierarchy, hierarchy, hierarchy, hierarchy, hierarchy, hierarchy, hierarchy, hierarchy, hierarchy, hierarchy, hierarchy, hierarchy, hierarchy, hierarchy, hierarchy, hierarchy, hierarchy, hierarchy, hierarchy, hierarchy, hierarchy, hierarchy, hierarchy, hierarchy, hierarchy, hierarchy, hierarchy, hierarchy,
Structure: are broadly divided by the number of buildings. Structures are broadly divided by the number of buildings.
Structure: The majority of everyday load-bearing structures are heavy-bearing structures. The majority of everyday load-bearing structures are heavy-duty structures.
Structure: Vector-active structures such as vector-active structures such as vectors and vector-active structures such as vectors and vectors. Vector-active structures are Vector-active structures such as vectors and vector-active structures such as vectors and vectors. Vector-active structures are Vector-active structures such as vectors and vector-active structures such as vectors and vectors. Vector-active structures are Vector-active structures such as vectors and vector-active structures such as vectors and vectors. Vector-active structures are Vector-
Structure: a higher-level structure is composed of higher-level structures. higher-level structures are composed of higher-level structures. higher-level structures are composed of higher-level structures. a higher-level structure composed of a higher-level structure composed of a higher-level structure composed of higher-level structures. Usually, a higher-level structure is composed of a higher-level structure composed of a higher-level structure composed of higher-level structures.
Structure: has a four-level structure. four-level structure. structure has a four-level structure. Protein structure has a four-level structure. Protein structure has a four-level structure. Protein structure has a four-level structure.
Structure: The primary structure is the sequence. The primary structure is the sequence. The primary structure is the sequence.
Structure: secondary structure consists of repeated repeated structures. The secondary structure consists of repeated secondary structures.
Structure: The tertiary structure is a tertiary structure. is a tertiary structure. The tertiary structure is a tertiary structure.
Structure: The structure can be represented by a structure. The structure can be represented by a structure.
Structure: Lewis structures use a dot notation notation. Lewis structures use a dot notation notation notation notation notation notation notation notation notation notation notation notation notation notation notation notation notation notation notation notation notation notation notation notation notation notation notation notation notation notation notation notation notation notation notation notation notation notation notation notation notation notation notation notation notation
Structure: the right side of the building. the left side of the building. Structure can be found at the left side of the building.
Structure: structures are applicable to people in structures. Structures are applicable to people in structures. Structures are applicable to people in structures.
Structure: Sociologists have studied the changing structure of society. Sociologists have studied the changing structure of society.
Structure: agency and structure are two confronted. Agency and structure are two confronted.
Structure: Structure Structure here refers to factors such as: Structure here refers to factors such as: Structure here refers to factors such as: Structure here refers to factors such as: Structure here refers to factors such as: Structure here refers to factors such as: Structure here refers to factors such as: Structure here refers to factors such as: Structure here refers to factors such as: Structure here refers to factors such as: Structure here refers to factors such as: Structure here refers to factors such as: Structure here
Structure: Data structures are built out of data structures. Data structures are built out of data structures.
Structure: The structure can be represented in graphs. The structure can be represented in graphs.
Structure: Philosophy, mathematics and science: A synthesis of philosophy, mathematics and science"
Space: three-dimensional space. Space is the boundless three-dimensional extent of space. Space is the boundless three-dimensional extent of space. Space is the boundless three-dimensional extent of space.
Space: in physical space as a physical space. Physical space is often conceived in terms of physical space. Physical space is often conceived in terms of physical space.
Space: space is considered. The concept of space is considered. The concept of space is considered.
Space: "space"), or in the Physics of Space (the Physics of "space"), or in the Physics of "space" (the Physics of "space"), or in the Physics of "space" (the Physics of "space"), or in the Physics of "space" (the Physics of "space"), or in the Physics of "space" (the Physics of "space"), or in the Physics of "space" (the Physics of "space"), or in the Physics of "space" (the Physics of "space
Space: space was a vast, vast, and vast space. a vast, vast, and vast space. Newton, space was a vast, vast, and vast space. In Isaac Newton's view, space was a vast, vast, and vast space.
Space: about space and time. Newton's theories about space and time are based on Isaac Newton's theories about time and space.
Space: his theory of space is of space is a theory of space. While his theory of space is a theory of space, his theory of space is a theory of space.
Space: a Cartesian spaceinfinite, infinite, infinite, infinite, infinite, infinite, infinite, infinite, infinite, infinite, infinite, infinite, infinite, infinite, infinite, infinite, infinite, infinite, infinite, infinite, infinite, infinite, infinite, infinite, infinite, infinite, infinite, infinite, infinite, infinite, infinite, infinite, infinite, infinite, infinite, infinite, infinite, infinite, infinite, infinite, infinite, infinite, infinite, infinite, infinite, infinite, infinite, infinite, infinite, infinite, infinite,
Space: space was an abysmal concept. For Leibniz, space was an abysmal concept.
Space: in as space. Space could be thought of in a number of ways. Space could be thought of in a number of ways. Space could be thought of in many ways.
Space: that space could not be a space. argued that space could not be a space. Leibniz argued that space could not be a space.
Space: to be more. Newton took space to be more. Newton took space to be more.
Space: , space knowledge is the knowledge about space. According to Kant, knowledge about space is the knowledge about space.
Space: vector spaces such as vector spaces such as vector spaces such as vector spaces such as vector spaces such as vector spaces such as vector spaces such as vector spaces such as vector spaces such as vector spaces are used to represent vector spaces such as vector spaces.
Space: Today, our three-dimensional space is viewed in three-dimensional space. Today, our three-dimensional space is viewed in three-dimensional space.
Space: time is a concept that is rooted in the idea that space-time is a time machine. Space-time is a concept that is rooted in the idea that space-time is a time machine.
Space: space dimensions, time and space dimensions, and space dimensions are also included. In addition, time and space dimensions are also included.
Space: in space. One can freely move in space. One can freely move in space.
Space: coordinates are derived from time and space coordinates. space and time coordinates are derived from time and space coordinates.
Space: It appears that space was created. It appears that space was created.
Space: space is a rectangular shape. space is rectangular in shape. The overall shape of space is rectangular in shape. The overall shape of space is rectangular in shape.
Space: the standard space interval, called the standard space interval, is set at a time interval of a certain length.
Space: of spaces and spaces. Cartography is the mapping of spaces and spaces. Cartography is the mapping of spaces and spaces.
Space: is often considered as a geographical space. Geographical space is often considered as a geographical area.
Space: space can also impact on human life. Space can also impact on human life.
Space: of space is not restricted. Ownership of space is not restricted.
Space: of airspace and waters. Ownership of airspace and waters. Ownership of airspace and waters. Ownership of airspace and waters. Ownership of airspace and waters. Ownership of airspace and waters. Ownership of airspace and waters. Ownership of airspace and waters. Ownership of airspace and waters. Ownership of airspace and waters. Ownership of airspace and waters. Ownership of airspace and waters. Ownership of airspace and waters. Ownership of water. Ownership of airspace
Space: public space. Public space is a term used to describe public space. Public space is a term used to describe public space.
Space: is a term used to describe the space between two or more objects. Abstract space is a term used to describe the space between objects. Abstract space is a term used to describe the space between objects. Abstract space is a term used to describe the space between objects. Abstract space is a term used to describe the space between objects. Abstract space is a term used to describe the space between objects. Abstract space is a term used to describe the space between objects. Abstract space is a term used to describe the space between objects
Space: the perception of space analyzing the perception of space analyzing the perception of space analyzing the perception of space. analyzing the perception of space................ Psychologists analyzing the perception of space. Psychologists analyzing the perception of space. Psychologists analyzing the perception of space..... Psychologists analyzing the perception of space..
Space: . Several space-related phobias have been identified.
Space: space in three-dimensional space. three-dimensional space in three-dimensional space. The understanding of three-dimensional space in three-dimensional space in three-dimensional space. The understanding of three-dimensional space in three-dimensional space in three-dimensional space.
Space: and Soja's "thridspace" and and Soja's "thridspace"
Space: is the space that is Bhabha's Third Space. that is that is that is that is that is that is Bhabha's Third Space. that is that is that is that is that is that is Bhabha's Third Space. that is that is Bhabha's Third Space. that is of of Bhabha. of of. of of of of Bhabha. of.
Calculus: , originally called infinitesimal calculus or infinitesimal calculus, originally called infinitesimal calculus or infinitesimal calculus, originally called infinitesimal calculus or infinitesimal calculus or infinitesimal calculus, originally called infinitesimal calculus or infinitesimal calculus or infinitesimal calculus or infinitesimal calculus or infinitesimal calculus or infinitesimal calculus or infinitesimal calculus or infinitesimal calcul
Calculus: Calculus Today, calculus has widespread uses in many fields.
Calculus: is a word that means calculus. The word calculus is a word that means calculus. The word calculus is a word that means calculus. The word calculus is a word that means calculus.
Calculus: calculus brought to the formal study of calculus the formal study of calculus brought to the formal study of calculus the formal study of calculus brought to the formal study of calculus the formal study of calculus brought to the formal study of calculus the formal study of calculus brought to the formal study of calculus the formal study of calculus brought to the formal study of calculus the formal study of calculus brought to the formal study of calculus the formal study of calculus brought to the formal study of calculus the formal study of
Calculus: the methods of calculus. He used the methods of calculus.
Calculus: "the science of calculus". Newton called his calculus "the science of calculus".
Calculus: early calculus the  is common. is common. In early calculus the use of the  is common. In early calculus the use of the  is common.
Calculus: Calculus has also been extended. also increased. has also increased. The reach of calculus has also increased. The reach of calculus has also increased.
Calculus: calculus was built on calculus. on calculus. calculus was built on calculus. The development of calculus was built on calculus.
Calculus: differential calculus include computations involving differential calculus. Applications of differential calculus include computations involving differential equations.
Calculus: integral calculus include computations involving integral calculus. Applications of integral calculus include computations involving integrals.
Calculus: is also used to gain weight. Calculus is also used to gain weight.
Calculus: Calculus provides tools, especially the limit calculator. Calculus provides tools, especially the limit calculator.
Calculus: , calculus is a mathematical system., calculus is a mathematical system., calculus is a calculus., calculus is calculus. From this point of view, calculus is calculus. From this point of view, calculus is calculus. From this point of view, calculus is calculus.
Calculus: is a calculus is a calculus calculus is a calculus calculus is a calculus is a calculus is a calculus is a calculus is a calculus is a calculus is a calculus is a calculus is a calculus is a calculus is a calculus is a calculus is a calculus is a calculus is a calculus is a calculus is a calculus is
Calculus: , integral calculus studies are applied to the study of integral calculus. In technical language, integral calculus studies are applied to integral calculus studies.
Calculus: of the calculus. In a formulation of the calculus. In a formulation of the calculus. In a formulation of the calculus.
Calculus: The fundamental theorem of calculus states:::: of calculus states:: we are arithmetic, then we are arithmetic.:: If we are arithmetic, then we are arithmetic. If we are arithmetic, then we are arithmetic.:::::::::: If: If: If: If:
Calculus: Physics makes particular use of calculus;
Calculus: calculus in determining the chemical composition of a compound. the chemical composition of a compound. chemistry also uses calculus in determining the chemical composition of a compound. Physicists also use calculus in determining the chemical composition of a compound.
Calculus: Calculus can be used in conjunction with Calculus. Calculus can be used in conjunction with Calculus to calculate the cost of Calculus. Calculus can be used in conjunction with Calculus to calculate the cost of Calculus.
Calculus: of medicine, calculus is the foundation of calculus. In the realm of medicine, calculus is the foundation of calculus.
Calculus: calculus is the basis for the theory of economics. In economics, calculus allows for the deterministic analysis of the monetary system.
Calculus: Calculus is also used to find the answer. Calculus is also used to find the answer. Calculus is also used to find the answer.
Calculus: calculus in a constructive manner of calculus in a constructive manner Reformulations of calculus in a constructive manner Reformulations of calculus in a constructive manner Reformulations of calculus in a constructive manner Reformulations of calculus in a constructive manner Reformulations of calculus in a constructive manner Reformulations of calculus in a constructive manner Reformulations of calculus in a constructive manner Reformulations of calculus in a constructive manner Reformulations of calculus in
Calculus: [1994], "Calculus", Encyclopedia of Mathematics, vol.
Calculus: Calculus Made Easy by Silvanus P.
Calculus: Calculus Problems and Solutions by Calculus Problems and Solutions by Calculus Problems and Solutions by Calculus Problems and Solutions by Calculus Problems and Solutions by Calculus Problems and Solutions by Calculus Problems and Solutions by Calculus Problems and Solutions by Calculus Problems and Solutions by Calculus Problems and Solutions by Calculus Problems and Solutions by Calculus Problems and Solutions by Calculus Problems and Solutions by Calculus Problems and Solutions by Calculus Problems and Solutions by Calculus Problems and Solutions by
Calculus: Donald Allen's notes on calculus Kouba Donald Allen's notes on calculus Donald Allen's notes on calculus Calculus training Kouba Donald Allen's notes on calculus Calculus training Kouba Donald Allen's notes on calculus Calculus training Kouba Donald Allen's notes on calculus Calculus training Kouba Donald Allen's notes on calculus Calculus training Kouba Donald Allen's notes on calculus Calculus training Kouba Donald Allen's notes on calculus Calculus training Kouba Donald Allen
Demographic_marketer: Demographic marketers use demographics in marketing research.
Statistician: is a person who studies statistics. A statistician is a person who uses statistics to determine the number of people who are using statistics to make a statistic. A statistician is a person who uses statistics to determine the number of people who are using statistics to make a statistic.
Statistician: in the professions. Statisticians are included with the professions. Statisticians are included with the professions.
Forensic_scientist: and criminal justice. Forensic scientists collect, preserve, and analyze scientific data. Forensic scientists collect, preserve, and analyze scientific data.
Forensic_scientist: forensic scientists travel to the forensics. While some forensic scientists travel to the forensics, some forensic scientists travel to the forensics.
Forensic_scientist: forensic scientists have started using laser scanners. to scan for fingerprints.
Gentleman_scientist: post-Renaissance France. The expression "gentleman scientist" arose in post-Renaissance France.
Private_income: is: any type of income Private income is: any type of income Private income is: any type of income Private income is: any type of income Private income is: any type of income Private income is: any type of income Private income is: any type of income Private income is: any type of income Private income is: any type of income Private income is: any type of income Private income is: any type of income Private income is: any type of income Private income is: any type of income Private income is: any type of income Private
Scientist: is someone who conducts research. A scientist is someone who conducts research. A scientist is someone who conducts research.
Scientist: have had different experiences. different eras have had different experiences. different eras have had different experiences. different eras have had different experiences. different eras have had different experiences. different eras have had different experiences. different experiences. different periods have had different experiences.
Scientist: , the medieval analogs of scientists. Hence, the medieval analogs of scientists.
Scientist: from the Islamic Golden Age of Islamic Science. from the Islamic Golden Age. Many proto-scientists from the Islamic Golden Age. Many proto-scientists from the Islamic Golden Age.
Scientist: the Italian Renaissance scientists like Giovanni Battista and Giovanni Battista were among the most famous Italian Renaissance scientists. During the Italian Renaissance scientists like Giovanni Battista and Giovanni Battista were among the most famous Italian Renaissance scientists.
Scientist: , including Galileo, have mathematically inclined friends.
Scientist: right to science. She campaigned for scientist's right to science.
Scientist: varies widely, varies widely. Although graduate education for scientists varies, the degree of a scientists education varies widely. Although graduate education for scientists varies widely, the degree of a scientists education varies widely.
Scientist: Some scientists have a desire to study the human body.... Some scientists have a desire to study the human body. Some scientists have a desire to study the human body. Some scientists have a desire to study the human body.
Scientist: Scientists tend to be less motivated than scientists. Scientists tend to be less motivated.
Scientist: 5% of scientists worked for the 5% of scientists. 5% of scientists worked for the 5% of scientists.
Scientist: were scientists. 59% of scientists in the United States were scientists. 59% of scientists in the United States were scientists.
Scientist: The Victorian Scientist: The Growth of Victorian Science: The Growth of Victorian Science: The Growth of Victorian Science: The Growth of Victorian Science: The Growth of Victorian Science: The Growth of Victorian Science: The Growth of Victorian Science: The Growth of Victorian Science: The Growth of Victorian Science: The Growth of Victorian Science: The Growth of Victorian Science: The Growth of Victorian Science: The Growth of Victorian Science: The Growth of Victorian Science: The Growth of Victorian Science: The Growth of Victorian Science: The Growth of Victorian Science: The Growth of Victorian Science:
Science: is a systematic enterprise that is a systematic enterprise that is a systematic enterprise that is a systematic enterprise that is a systematic enterprise that is a systematic enterprise that is a systematic enterprise that is a systematic enterprise that is a systematic enterprise that is a systematic enterprise that is a systematic enterprise that is a systematic enterprise that is a systematic enterprise that is a systematic enterprise that is a systematic enterprise that is a systematic enterprise that is a systematic enterprise that is a systematic enterprise that is a systematic
Science: science is typically divided into two main categories: "Science is typically divided into two main categories: "Science is typically divided into two main categories: "Science is typically divided into two main categories: "Science is typically divided into two main categories: "Science is typically divided into two main categories: "Science is typically divided into two categories: "Science is typically divided into two categories: "Science is typically divided into two categories: "Science is typically divided into two categories: "Science is typically divided into two categories: "Science is typically divided into two categories
Science: science is distinct in its own right. Modern science is distinct in its own right.
Science: its original sense was science. Science in its original sense was science in its original sense was science in its original sense was science in its original sense was science in its original sense was science in its original sense was science in its original sense was science in its original sense was science in its original sense was science in its original sense was science in its original sense was science in its original sense was science in its original sense was science in its original sense was science in its original sense was science in its original sense was science in its original sense was science in its original
Science: are not limited to the general fields of science. However, the general fields of science are the general fields of science.
Science: the world of science. This new science began to see the world of science.
Science: that science should be taught to be scientific. Bacon argued that science should be taught to be scientific. Bacon argued that science should be taught to be scientific.
Science: and social sciences are both disciplines. sciences are both disciplines. Both natural and social sciences are both disciplines.
Science: Physical science is subdivided into branches, branches, and disciplines.
Science: science is the successor to modern natural science. Modern natural science is the successor to modern natural science.
Science: including systematic data collection, including discovery science, and data analysis. Systematic data collection, including discovery science, including discovery science, and data analysis.
Science: The formal sciences share similarities with the formal sciences. The formal sciences share similarities with the formal sciences.
Science: are therefore a formative science. are a formative science. The formal sciences are therefore a formative science.
Science: . a role in the development of the formal sciences. the formal sciences play an important role in the development of the formal sciences.
Science: that rely heavily on the natural sciences. Natural and social sciences that rely heavily on the natural sciences that rely heavily on the natural sciences that rely heavily on the natural sciences that rely heavily on the natural sciences that rely heavily on the natural sciences that rely heavily on the natural sciences that rely heavily on the natural sciences that rely heavily on the natural sciences that rely heavily on the natural sciences.
Science: is especially important in science. Experimentation is especially important in science. Experimentation is especially important in the field of chemistry.
Science: science applies computing power to the human brain. science applies computing power to the human brain. Computational science applies computing power to the human brain.
Science: philosophy of science seeks a deep understanding of science. philosophy of science seeks a deep understanding of science. philosophy of science seeks a deep understanding of science. philosophy of science seeks a deep understanding of science...............................
Science: science as the science of the natural world. He characterized normal science as the science of the natural world.
Science: m maintains that proper science is a science that is not a science. Methodological naturalism maintains that proper science is a science that is not a science.
Science: Karl Popper The philosopher of science Karl Popper Karl Popper Karl Popper Karl Popper Karl Popper Karl Popper Karl Popper Karl Popper Karl Popper Karl Popper Karl Popper Karl Popper Karl Popper Karl Popper Karl Popper Karl Popper Karl Popper Karl Popper Karl Popper Karl Popper Karl Popper Karl Popper Karl Popper Karl Popper Karl Popper Karl Popper Karl Popper Karl Popper Karl Popper Karl Popper Karl Popper Karl Popper Karl Popper Karl Popper Karl Popper
Science: science is gained by gaining knowledge in science. Science is gained by gaining knowledge in the field of science.
Science: that the successful sciences were the successful sciences. He held that the successful sciences were the successful sciences.
Science: Science has become so pervasive in our society that Science has become so pervasive in our society. Science has become so pervasive in our society that it is so pervasive in our society that it is so pervasive in our society that it is so pervasive in our society that it is so pervasive in our society that it is so pervasive in our society that it is so pervasive in our society that it is so pervasive in our society that it is so pervasive in our society
Science: such as New Scientist, Science Magazine, and more.
Science: Science books engage the interest of the reader the reader. Science books engage the interest of the reader. Science books engage the interest of the reader.
Science: science fiction, is a genre of science fiction, primarily based on science fiction. Tangentially, the science fiction genre, primarily based on science fiction, is a genre of science fiction, primarily based on science fiction.
Science: as "the science of science". Science has been described as "the science of science" as "the science of science". Science has been described as "the science of science" and "the science of science has been described as the science of science". Science has been described as "the science of science" and "the science of science has been described as the science of science".
Science: Women faced considerable discrimination in science, and in science, women faced considerable discrimination in science, and in science, women faced considerable discrimination in science, and in science, women faced considerable discrimination in science, and in science, women faced considerable discrimination in science, and in science, women faced considerable discrimination in science, and in science, women faced considerable discrimination in science, and in science, women faced considerable discrimination in science, and in science, women faced considerable discrimination in science, and in science, women faced considerable discrimin
Science: in science and technology. The achievements of women in science and technology.
Science: of science of science of science of science of science of science of science. of science of science and social science of science. of science and social science of science. and social science of science. of science and social science of science. and social science of science. and social science of science... of science. of science of science. of science. of science. of science. of science... Sociology
Science: science, began in the 1970s. the 1970s, has been a major force in the professionization of science.
Science: Science policy also refers to the science policy of the United States. Science policy also refers to the science policy of the United States.
Science: Science policy thus deals with the science policy. Science policy deals with the science policy.
Science: of science is usually accomplished by politics of science. Politicization of science is usually accomplished by politics of science.
Science: . Wikibooks.orgResources Wikibooks.orgResources Wikibooks.orgResources Wikibooks.orgResources Euroscience Classification of the Sciences in the Sciences in the Sciences in the Sciences in the Sciences in the Sciences in the Sciences in the Sciences in the Sciences in the Sciences in the Sciences in the Sciences in the Sciences in the Sciences in the Sciences in the Sciences in the Sciences in the Sciences in the Sciences in the Sciences in the Sciences in the Sciences in the Sciences in the Sciences in the Sciences
Science: Science Initiative Selected science initiatives selected science initiatives selected science initiatives selected science initiatives selected science initiatives selected science initiatives selected science initiatives selected science initiatives selected science initiatives selected science initiatives selected science initiatives selected science initiatives selected science initiatives selected science initiatives selected science initiatives selected science initiatives selected science initiatives selected science initiatives selected science initiatives selected science initiatives selected science initiatives selected science initiatives selected science initiatives selected science initiatives selected science initiatives selected science initiatives selected science initiatives selected science initiatives selected science initiatives selected science initiatives selected science initiatives selected science initiatives selected science initiatives selected science initiatives selected science initiatives selected science initiatives selected
Hobby: a regular activity. A hobby is a regular activity. A hobby is a regular activity. A hobby is a regular activity. A hobby is a regular activity. A hobby is a regular activity. A hobby is a regular activity. A hobby is a regular activity. A hobby is a regular activity. A hobby is a regular activity. A hobby is a regular activity. A hobby is a regular activity. A hobby is a regular activity. A hobby is a hobby
Hobby: are identified under three (3) categories. Hobbyists may be identified under three (3) categories. Hobbyists may be identified under three (3) categories Hobbyists may be identified under three (3) categories Hobbyists may be identified under three (3) categories Hobbyists may be identified under three (3) categories Hobbyists may be identified under three (3) categories Hobbyists may be identified under three (3) categories Hobbyists may be identified under three (3) categories Hobbyists may be identified under three (3) categories Hobbyists may be identified under three (3) categories Hobbyists may
Hobby: "hobby horse" was documented in the 18th century. The term "hobby horse" was documented in the 18th century.
Hobby: "hobby", was a derivative of "hobby", and by 1816 the derivative, "hobby", was a derivative of "hobby". By 1816 the derivative, "hobby", was a derivative of "hobby", and by 1816 the derivative, "hobby", was a derivative of "hobby".
Hobby: an activity that became a hobby that became an activity that became an activity that became a hobby that became an activity that became a hobby that became an activity that became a hobby that became an activity that became a hobby that became an activity that became a hobby that became an activity that became a hobby that became an activity that became a hobby that became an activity that became a hobby that became an activity that became a hobby that became an activity that became an activity that became an activity that became an activity that became an activity
Hobby: he was acknowledging that a man was a man. he was acknowledging that a man was a man. he was acknowledging that a man was a man. He was acknowledging that a man was a man. He was acknowledging that a man was a man. He was acknowledging that a man was a man. He was acknowledging that a man was a man. He was acknowledging that a man was a man.
Hobby: a hobby is the pleasure of a hobby. a hobby is the pleasure of a hobby. The pleasure of a hobby is the pleasure of a hobby.
Hobby: The Serious Leisure Perspective is a magazine for hobbyists. The Serious Leisure Perspective is a magazine for hobbyists.
Hobby: hobbyists engage in five broad types of hobby activities. Hobbyists engage in five broad types of hobby activities. Hobbyists engage in five broad types of hobby activities. Hobbyists engage in five broad types of hobby activities. Hobbyists engage in five broad types of hobby activities. Hobbyists engage in five broad types of hobby activities. Hobbyists engage in five broad types of hobby activities. Hobbyists engage in five broad types of hobby activities. Hobbyists engage in five broad types of hobby activities.
Hobby: individual pursuit of a hobby. hobby. However, individual pursuit of a hobby. However, individual pursuit of a hobby. However, individual pursuit of a hobby.
Hobby: Collecting is an ancient hobby. a hobby that has been around for centuries. Collecting is an ancient hobby, with collectors collecting coins from the past.
Hobby: collectors have turned their hobby into a collectors hobby. Sometimes collectors have turned their hobby into a collectors hobby.
Hobby: hobbyists, CNC CNC is is for you! CNC CNC is for computer savvy do-it-yourself hobbyists. CNC CNC CNC is for CNC savvy do-it-yourself hobbyists.
Hobby: .. This is a demanding hobby that requires a lot of work.
Hobby: This hobby originated in the United Kingdom. This hobby originated in the United Kingdom.
Hobby: .. Dressmaking has been a major hobby for many years. Dressmaking has been a major hobby for many years. Dressmaking has been a major hobby for many years.
Government_scientist: by the government. A government scientist is a scientist employed by the government. A government scientist is a scientist employed by the government.
Government_scientist: , government scientists and engineers were consulted by the government. Before the Second World War, government scientists and engineers were consulted by the government.
Inventor: is a person who has invented something. An inventor is a person who has invented something. An inventor is a person who has invented something.
Inventor: inventor comes from the word inventor. The word inventor comes from the word inventor.
Psychologist: A psychologist studies normal and abnormal behavior. A psychologist studies normal and abnormal behavior. A psychologist studies normal and abnormal behavior.
Psychologist: Licensed psychologists are required to practice psychology. license. Most psychologists need a license.. to practice psychology. to practice psychology. practice psychology... practice psychology. practice psychology. practice psychology. practice psychology.. practice psychology. Most psychologists need a license to practice psychology. license. license. practice psychology. practice psychology. license.. practice psychology. practice psychology. Most psychologists need a license to practice
Psychologist: a doctoral degree is required. a doctoral degree is required. Typically, psychologists need a doctoral degree. Typically, psychologists need a masters degree.
Psychologist: Psychologists can work in applied or applied settings. Psychologists can work in applied or applied settings.
Psychologist: as well as their families. as well as their families. Academic psychologists educate higher-education students as well as their families. students as well as their families. Academic psychologists educate higher-education students as well as their families. Academic psychologists educate higher-education students as well as their families.
Psychologist: have one of two types of psychologists. Psychologists typically have one of two types of psychologists.
Psychologist: may also be consulted. Clinical and counseling psychologists may also be consulted. Clinical and counseling psychologists may also be consulted.
Psychologist: , psychologists with a specialization in psychology have been surveyed by psychologists with specialization in psychology in five US states. In five US states, psychologists with specialization in psychology have been surveyed by psychologists with specialization in psychology in five states.
Psychologist: psychologists spend several years researching and analyzing psychological problems. In addition, psychologists spend several years researching and analyzing psychological problems.
Psychologist: psychologists is governed by the restriction for psychologists. The restriction for psychologists is governed by the restriction for psychologists.
Psychologist: in the United States. There are about 6200 licensed psychologists in the United States.
Psychologist: are legally required to be psychologists in Greece. are required to be psychologists in Greece. are required to be psychologists in Greece. to be psychologists in Greece. Psychologists in Greece are legally required to be psychologists in Greece.
Psychologist: are not required to be a psycholog in Greece. are not required to be a psycholog in Greece.
Psychologist: of psychologists, The Dutch professional association of psychologists, The Dutch professional association of psychologists, The Dutch professional association of psychologists, The Dutch professional association of psychologists, The Dutch professional association of psychologists, The Dutch professional association of psychologists, The Dutch professional association of psychologists, The Dutch professional association of psychologists, The Dutch professional association of psychologists, The Dutch professional association of psychologists, The Dutch professional association of psychologists, The Dutch professional association of psychologists, The Dutch professional association of psychologists, The Dutch professional association
Psychologist: The titles "psychotherapist" and "healthcare psychologist"
Psychologist: , "clinical psychologist", "counseling psychologist", "clinical psychologist", "clinical psychologist", "counseling psychologist", "clinical psychologist", "counseling psychologist", "clinical psychologist", "counseling psychologist", "clinical psychologist", "counseling psychologist", "clinical psychologist", "counseling psychologist", "clinical psychologist", "counseling psychologist", "clinical psychologist", "counseling psychologist", "clinical psychologist", "counseling psychologist", "clinical psychologist", "clin
Psychologist: "neuropsychologist" is not a "neuropsychologist". The title "neuropsychologist" is not a "neuropsychologist".
Psychologist: "psychologist", by itself, is a title that, by itself, is not a title.
Psychologist: for Psychologists in the United States campaigned in the United States. for Psychologists in the United States campaigned in the United States. Psychologists in the United States campaigned in the United States. in the United States. Psychologists in the United States campaigned in the United States. Psychologists in the United States campaigned in the United States. Psychologists in the United States campaigned in the United States. Psychologists in the United States campaigned in the United States.
Psychologist: ten psychologists were trained by 1997. By 1997, ten psychologists were trained by ten psychologists. By 1997, ten psychologists were trained by ten psychologists.
Psychologist: Clinical and Counseling psychologists in the UK. Clinical and Counseling psychologists in the UK.
Psychologist: a psychologist takes an introductory course. Licence as a psychologist takes an introductory course. Licence as a psychologist takes an introductory course.
Research_fellow: fellow is an academic researcher. A research fellow is an academic researcher who is a student of an academic institution. A research fellow is a researcher who is a student of an academic institution.
Research_fellow: may act as a research fellow or as a research fellow. A research fellow may act as a researcher or as a researcher.
Research_fellow: other research fellows undertake postdoctoral research. research fellows undertake postdoctoral research. Some research fellows undertake postdoctoral research or postdoctoral research.
Research_fellow: . Research fellow positions vary in different countries. Research fellow positions vary in different countries.
Research_fellow: research fellow has been used in the past. has been used in the past to refer to researchers.
Research_fellow: were paid either by the research fellow or by the research fellow. Research fellows were paid either by the research fellow or by the research fellow.
Research_fellow: particularly in Oxbridge style colleges, research is particularly important in research colleges. colleges, research is particularly important in Oxbridge style colleges, particularly in Oxbridge style colleges, where research is particularly important in research colleges.
Research_fellow: may award junior research fellowships... may award junior research fellowships.. may award junior research fellowships... may award junior research fellowships... may award junior research fellowships.. may award junior research fellowships. may award junior research fellowships.. may award junior research fellowships....... needed. as well as junior research fellowships... well as
Research_fellow: fellowship is funded by government academic grants. Research fellowship is funded by government academic grants.
Research_fellow: Research fellows research under the supervision of a research fellow. Research fellows research under the supervision of a research fellow.
Diplomatic_mission: is a diplomatic mission. is a mission that is sent to the United States. A diplomatic mission is a foreign mission.
Diplomatic_mission: , the phrase diplomatic mission is used in practice., the phrase diplomatic mission is used in the phrase diplomatic mission. In practice, the phrase diplomatic mission is used in the phrase diplomatic mission.
Diplomatic_mission: a diplomatic mission. mission, mission, and diplomatic mission, the mission is also a diplomatic mission. mission, the mission is also a diplomatic mission., the mission is also a diplomatic mission., the mission is also a diplomatic mission..
Diplomatic_mission: a diplomatic mission generally based in the United States. An embassy is a diplomatic mission generally based in the United States.
Diplomatic_mission: is a permanent mission. A permanent mission is a diplomatic mission. A permanent mission is a diplomatic mission.
Diplomatic_mission: general is a diplomatic mission of the United States. general is a diplomatic mission of the United States. A consulate general is a diplomatic mission of the United States. A consulate general is a consulate general is a consulate general.
Diplomatic_mission: A consulate is a diplomatic mission that is a diplomatic mission. is a diplomatic mission that is a diplomatic mission. A consulate is a diplomatic mission that is a diplomatic mission. A consulate is a diplomatic mission that is a diplomatic mission.
Diplomatic_mission: a diplomatic mission can be a diplomatic mission. a diplomatic mission can be a diplomatic mission. diplomatic mission can be a diplomatic mission. a diplomatic mission can be a diplomatic mission. The members of a diplomatic mission can be a diplomatic mission, a diplomatic mission, a diplomatic mission, a diplomatic mission, a diplomatic mission, a diplomatic mission, a diplomatic mission, a diplomatic mission, a diplomatic mission, a diplomatic mission, a diplomatic mission, a diplomatic
Diplomatic_mission: not the premises of diplomatic missions. are not the premises of diplomatic missions. Rather, the premises of diplomatic missions are the premises of diplomatic missions.
Diplomatic_mission: of the British Commonwealth of the British Commonwealth have been arranged for diplomatic missions between members of the British Commonwealth and British Commonwealth diplomats.
Diplomatic_mission: of diplomatic missions. The rights and immunities of diplomatic missions. The rights and immunities of diplomatic missions.
Diplomatic_mission: not diplomatic missions, they are nevertheless not diplomatic missions, they are not diplomatic missions, they are not diplomatic missions, they are not diplomatic missions, they are not diplomatic missions, they are not diplomatic missions, they are not diplomatic missions, they are not diplomatic missions, they are not diplomatic missions, they are not diplomatic missions, they are not diplomatic missions, they are not diplomatic missions, they are not diplomatic missions, they are not diplomatic missions, they are not diplomatic missions, they are not diplomatic missions, they are not diplomatic missions, their missions are not diplomatic
Embassy: is a diplomatic mission. An embassy is a diplomatic mission. An embassy is a diplomatic mission.
Embassy: is an embassy. A high commission is an embassy. A high commission is an embassy. A high commission is an embassy. A high commission is an embassy. A high commission is an embassy. A high commission is an embassy. A high commission is an embassy. A high commission is an embassy. A high commission is an embassy. A high commission is an embassy. A high commission is an embassy.
Embassy: an embassy was headed by a man who was a diplomat. Where an embassy was headed by a man who was a diplomat.
Embassy: embassy. The term embassy is commonly used to describe a foreign embassy in the United States.
Embassy: operates in the embassy. the embassy in the embassy. the embassy operates in the embassy. Therefore, the embassy operates in the embassy.
Embassy: , diplomatic channels are opened., diplomatic channels are opened to the embassy staff. Once inside, diplomatic channels are opened to the embassy staff. Once inside the embassy, diplomatic channels are opened to the embassy staff. Once inside the embassy, diplomatic channels are opened to the embassy staff. Once inside the embassy, diplomatic channels are opened to the embassy staff. Once inside the embassy, diplomatic channels are opened to the embassy staff. Once inside the embassy, diplomatic channels are opened to the embassy staff.
Embassy: embassy extraterritoriality. embassy extraterritoriality.::: embassy extraterritoriality, embassy extraterritoriality, and embassy extraterritoriality. Notable violations of embassy extraterritoriality include: embassy extraterritoriality, embassy extraterritoriality, embassy extraterritoriality, embassy extraterritoriality, embassy extraterritoriality, embassy extraterritoriality, and embassy
National_Institutes_of_Health: of health. The National Institutes of Health is the primary agency responsible for the National Institutes of Health.
Biologist: is a professional who studies the environment. A biologist is a professional who studies the environment. A biologist is a professional who studies the environment. A biologist is a professional who studies the environment.
Biologist: in fundamental research attempt to understand why biologists involved in fundamental research attempt to understand why biologists involved in fundamental research attempt to understand why scientists are so interested in fundamental research attempt to understand why scientists are so interested in fundamental research attempt to understand why scientists are so interested in fundamental research attempt to understand why they are so interested in fundamental research attempt to understand why scientists are so interested in fundamental research attempt to understand why they are so interested in fundamental research attempt to understand why they are so interested in fundamental research attempt to understand why they are so interested in fundamental research.
Biologist: applied research to understand the biology of applied research. involved in applied research attempt to understand the biology of applied research. Biologists involved in applied research attempt to understand the biology of applied research.
Biologist: the biology of the human body. Biologists are interested in understanding the biology of the human body. Biologists are interested in understanding the biology of the human body.
Biologist: using the scientific method. Biologists conduct research using the scientific method.
Biologist: ad hoc ad hoc ad hoc ad hoc ad hoc ad hoc ad hoc ad hoc ad hoc ad hoc ad hoc ad hoc ad hoc ad hoc ad hoc ad hoc ad hoc ad hoc ad hoc ad hoc ad hoc ad hoc
Biologist: use mathematical methods. to study biological systems. biologists use mathematical methods. Theoretical biologists use mathematical methods.
Biologist: Some biologists work on microorganisms, while others work on macroorganisms.
Biologist: theoretical biologists usually work in the theoretical realm, theoretical biologists usually work in the empirical realm. While theoretical biologists usually work in the empirical realm, theoretical biologists usually work in the theoretical realm.
Biologist: developmental biologists study the process of developmental development. Developmental biologists study the process of development.
Biologist: study the biological activity of a single organism. Molecular biologists study the biological activity of a single organism.
Biologist: microbiology. Microbiologists investigate the growth and characteristics of microorganisms. Microbiologists investigate the growth and characteristics of microorganisms.
Biologist: Biologists apply the techniques of computational biologists to the techniques of computational biologists. Computational Biologists apply the techniques of computational biologists to the applications of computational biologists.
Biologist: study animals and wildlife biologists study animals and wildlife biologists study wildlife biologists study animals and wildlife biologists study birds and mammals. Zoologists and wildlife biologists study animals and wildlife biologists study birds and mammals.
Biologist: and wildlife biologists may also be able to assist Zoologists and wildlife biologists. Zoologists and wildlife biologists may also be able to assist Zoologists and wildlife biologists may also be able to assist Zoologists and wildlife biologists may also be able to assist Zoologists and wildlife biologists may also be able to assist Zoologists and wildlife biologists may also be able to assist Zoologists and wildlife biologists may also be able to assist Zoologists and wildlife biologists may also be able to assist Zoologists and
Biologist: Aquatic biologists study micro-organisms, plants, and fishes. They study micro-organisms, plants, and fishes.
Biologist: study salt water organisms.
Biologist: biologists investigate the evolutionary processes that lead to the evolution of the species. Evolutionary biologists investigate the evolutionary processes that lead to the evolution of the species.
Biologist: marine biologists encounter a variety of marine life. marine life. marine biologists encounter a variety of marine life. marine life. marine life. marine life. marine life. marine life.ologists marine life. biologists. marine life. marine biologists encounter a variety of marine life. marine life. marine life.ologists marine life. marine life. marine life marine life. marine life marine marine. marine marine
Biologist: obtain their licenses from the marine biologists, most marine biologists obtain their licenses from the marine biologists. Although some marine biologists obtain their licenses from the marine biologists, most marine biologists obtain their licenses from the marine biologists.
Biomedical_scientist: is a scientist trained in the field of biomedical science. A biomedical scientist is a scientist trained in the field of biomedical science.
Biomedical_scientist: biomedical scientists is referred to as biomedical research. The research of biomedical scientists is referred to as biomedical research.
Biomedical_scientist: biomedical scientists conduct research in the field of biomedical sciences. the field of biomedical science. biomedical scientists conduct research in the field of biomedical science. the field of biomedical sciences. Biomedical scientists conduct research in the field of biomedical sciences.
Biomedical_scientist: biomedical scientists may also work directly with biomedical scientists. Biomedical scientists may also work directly with biomedical scientists.
Biomedical_scientist: biomedical scientists employ a variety of techniques to develop new treatments. to develop new treatments. biomedical scientists employ a variety of techniques. to develop new treatments. Biomedical scientists employ a variety of techniques to develop new treatments. Biomedical scientists employ a variety of techniques to develop new treatments. Biomedical scientists employ a variety of techniques to develop new treatments. Biomedical scientists employ a variety of techniques to develop new treatments. Biomedical scientists employ a variety of techniques.
Biomedical_scientist: also possess a medical degree. degree. medical degree. medical degree. medical degree. medical degree. degree. degree. Some biomedical scientists possess a medical degree. degree. degree. medical degree. degree. degree. medical degree. degree. Some biomedical scientists possess a medical degree. Some biomedical scientists possess a medical degree. Some biomedical scientists possess medical degree medical degree. medical degree degree
Biomedical_scientist: biomedical scientists, employment is not restricted to biomedical scientists.
Biomedical_scientist: "Biomedical scientist" is the protected title used in the protected title used in the protected title "Biomedical scientist". "Biomedical scientist" is the protected title used in the protected title "Biomedical scientist".
Biomedical_scientist: Scientists along with scientists in other fields. Biomedical Scientists along with scientists in other fields.
Botanist: , plant scientist or phytologist. A botanist, plant scientist or phytologist. A botanist, plant scientist or phytologist.
Botanist: study approximately 410,000 species. Today, botanists study approximately 410,000 species.
Botanist: Botanists examine both the internal functions and the external functions of Botanists. Botanists examine both the internal functions and the external functions of Botanists.
Botanist: also study weeds. also study weeds. Botanists also study weeds, which are weeds that are weeds. Botanists also study weeds, which are weeds that are weeds.
Medical_laboratory_scientist: a medical laboratory scientist, is a medical laboratory scientist, also traditionally referred to as a medical laboratory scientist, is a medical laboratory scientist, also traditionally referred to as a medical laboratory scientist. A medical laboratory scientist is a medical laboratory scientist, also traditionally referred to as a medical laboratory scientist, also traditionally referred to as a medical laboratory scientist.
Medical_laboratory_scientist: scientists work in clinical laboratories. scientists work in clinical laboratories. Medical laboratory scientists work in clinical laboratories.
Medical_laboratory_scientist: a medical laboratory scientist gives to a medical laboratory scientist. The information that a medical laboratory scientist gives to a medical laboratory scientist is the information that a medical laboratory scientist gives to a medical laboratory scientist. The information that a medical laboratory scientist gives to a medical laboratory scientist is the information that a medical laboratory scientist gives to a medical laboratory scientist.
Medical_laboratory_scientist: medical laboratory scientists operate complex electronic equipment, computers, and other complex electronic equipment, computers, and other complex electronic equipment, computers, and other complex electronic equipment, computers, and other complex electronic equipment, computers, and other complex electronic equipment, computers, and other complex electronic equipment, computers, and other complex electronic equipment, computers, and other complex electronic equipment, computers, and other complex electronic equipment, computers, and other complex electronic equipment, computers, and other complex electronic equipment, computers, and other complex electronic equipment, computers.
Medical_laboratory_scientist: and nurses in assisting in the laboratory. Medical laboratory scientists assist doctors and nurses in assisting in the laboratory.
Medical_laboratory_scientist: the patient specimens, and analyze the patient specimens. Medical laboratory scientists receive the patient specimens, receive the patient specimens, and analyze the patient specimens.
Medical_laboratory_scientist: must recognize anomalies in their work. Medical laboratory scientists must recognize anomalies in their work. Medical laboratory scientists must recognize anomalies in their work.
Medical_laboratory_scientist: medical laboratory scientists are: performed by medical laboratory scientists are: a blood test, a blood test, a blood test, a blood test, a blood test, a blood test, a blood test, a blood test, a blood test, a blood test, a blood test, a blood test, a blood test, a blood test, a blood test, a blood test, a blood test, a blood test, a blood test, and other tests.
Medical_laboratory_scientist: are skilled in diverse fields. Because medical laboratory scientists are skilled in diverse fields. Because medical laboratory scientists are skilled in diverse fields.
Medical_laboratory_scientist: comprehensive Medical laboratory scientist degree programs are comprehensive Medical laboratory scientist degree programs are common comprehensive Medical laboratory scientist degree programs are common comprehensive Medical laboratory scientist degree programs are common comprehensive Medical laboratory scientist degree programs are common comprehensive Medical laboratory scientist degree programs are common comprehensive Medical laboratory scientist degree programs are common comprehensive Medical laboratory scientist degree programs are common comprehensive Medical laboratory scientist degree programs are common comprehensive Medical laboratory scientist degree programs are common comprehensive Medical laboratory scientist degree programs are common comprehensive Medical laboratory scientist degree programs are common comprehensive Medical laboratory scientist degree programs are common comprehensive Medical laboratory scientist degree
Medical_laboratory_scientist: United States Medical Laboratory Scientist and In the United States Medical Laboratory Scientist and In the United States Medical Laboratory Scientist and In the United States Medical Laboratory Scientist and In the United States Medical Laboratory Scientist and In the United States Medical Laboratory Scientist and In the United States Medical Laboratory Scientist and In the United States Medical Laboratory Scientist and In the United States Medical Laboratory Scientist and In the United States Medical Laboratory Scientist and In the United States Medical Laboratory Scientist and In the United States Medical Laboratory Scientist and In the United States Medical Laboratory Scientist and In the United States Medical Laboratory
Microbiologist: A microbiologist is a scientist who studies bacteria. A microbiologist is a scientist who studies bacteria in a laboratory.
Microbiologist: microbiologists work in offices and/or laboratories. Most microbiologists work in offices and/or laboratories.
Microbiologist: microbiologists microbiology. microbiology. microbiology... field. field. field. field. Microbiologists specialize in a given microbiology. Microbiologists specialize in a given microbiology. field. field. field. field. field. field. field. field. field. microbiology... microbiology.......
Microbiologist: include a variety of tasks. this work includes a variety of tasks. For many microbiologists, this work includes a variety of tasks.
Microbiologist: Microbiologists working in the medical field, Microbiologists working in the medical field, Microbiologists working in the medical field, Microbiologists working in the pharmaceutical field, Microbiologists working in the medical field, Microbiologists working in the pharmaceutical field, Microbiologists working in the medical field, Microbiologists working in the medical field, Microbiologists working in the medical field, Microbiologists working in the medical field, Microbiologists working in the medical field, Microbiologists working in the medical field, Microbiologists working
Microbiologist: may have a role in microbiology in industry roles. Microbiologists in industry roles may have a role in microbiology in their industry roles.
Microbiologist: may have a problem with microbiologists working in government. Microbiologists working in government may have a problem with microbiologists working in private sector.
Microbiologist: microbiologists work in the field. Some microbiologists work in the field.
Microbiologist: Clinical microbiologists tend to work in clinical microbiology. Clinical microbiologists tend to work in clinical microbiology.
Microbiologist: microbiologists work in the laboratory. laboratories. microbiologists work in the laboratory. Some microbiologists work in the laboratory.
Microbiologist: This is true for clinical microbiologists.
Neuroscientist: A neuroscientist is a scientist who studies the brain. A neuroscientist is a person who studies the brain and uses it to make decisions.
Neuroscientist: generally work as researchers within the neurosciences. Neuroscientists generally work as researchers within the neurosciences.
Neuroscientist: neuroscientists typically spend most of their time in research-oriented careers. In research-oriented careers, neuroscientists typically spend most of their time in the field of neuroscience.
Neuroscientist: . Biomedically-oriented neuroscientists typically engage in biomedical-oriented neuroscientific research. Biomedically-oriented neuroscientists typically engage in biomedical-oriented neuroscientific research.
Neuroscientist: Neuroscientists have a number of neuroscientists. Neuroscientists also have a number of neuroscientists.
Neuroscientist: on the 14th of November. on the 14th of November. The Neuroscientists day is celebrated on the 14th of November.
Neuroscientist: post doctoral studies, neuroscientists will be able to postdoctoral research. Once neuroscientists finish their post doctoral studies, neuroscientists will be able to postdoctoral research.
Neuroscientist: neuroscientific tools to understand the brain. Neuroscientists use a wide range of neuroimaging techniques to study the brain.
Neuroscientist: in neuroscientists. Neuroscientists can also be part of the Neurosciences team. Neuroscientists can also be part of Neuroscientists.
Neuroscientist: typically study neurosciences as a major course of study. In their undergraduate years, neuroscientists typically study neurosciences as a major course of study.
Neuroscientist: Neuroscientists may study topics from the brain. Neuroscientists may study topics from the brain.
Neuroscientist: study human consciousness, specifically the human brain. study human consciousness. Cognitive neuroscientists study human consciousness, specifically the human mind.
Neuroscientist: studying neuroscientists. Neuroscientists are also at work studying neuronal processes.
Neuroscientist: have studied this disorder, neuroscientists had studied this disorder for decades.
Neuroscientist: that studied this disorder were neuroscientists that studied this disorder. The neuroscientists that studied this disorder were neuroscientists that studied this disorder.
Neuroscientist: Neuroscientists then provided a model for neuronal models. a model for neuronal models.ss then provided a model for neuronal models. Neuroscientists then provided a model for neuronal models. Neuroscientists then provided a model for neuronal models. neuronal models.
Neuroscientist: not do this. not do this. did not do this. and other neuroscientists did not do this. and other neuroscientists did not do this.berg and not do this. not do this. did not. not. not. not. not.
Neuroscientist: have performed studies where neuroscientists have performed studies where neuroscientists have performed studies where neuroscientists have performed studies where neuroscientists have performed studies where neuroscientists have performed studies where neuroscientists have performed studies where neuroscientists have performed studies where neuroscientists have performed studies where neuroscientists have performed studies where neuroscientists have performed studies where neuroscientists have performed studies where neuroscientists have performed studies where neuroscientists have performed studies where neuroscientists
Neuroscientist: "Nora Volkow: Motivated Neuroscientist" in "Nora Volkow: Motivated Neuroscientist" in "Nora Volkow: Motivated Neuroscientist" in "Nora Volkow: Motivated Neuroscientist" in "Nora Volkow: Motivated Neuroscientist" in "Nora Volkow: Motivated Neuroscientist" in "Nora Volkow: Motivated Neuroscientist" in "Nora Volkow: Motivated Neuroscientist" in
Neuroscientist: To Become a Neuroscientist maintained by To Become a Neuroscientist maintained by To Become a Neuroscientist maintained by To Become a Neuroscientist maintained by To Become a Neuroscientist maintained by To Become a Neuroscientist maintained by To Become a Neuroscientist maintained by To Become a Neuroscientist maintained by To Become a Neuroscientist maintained by To Become a Neuroscientist maintained by To Become a Neuroscientist maintained by To
Clinical_pharmaceutical_scientist: clinical pharmaceutical scientist is a licensed, practicing, licensed, practicing, licensed, practicing, licensed, practicing, licensed, practicing pharmacist, licensed clinical pharmaceutical scientist, licensed clinical pharmaceutical scientist, and a clinical pharmaceutical scientist. A clinical pharmaceutical scientist is a licensed, practicing, licensed, practicing, licensed, practicing pharmacist, licensed clinical pharmacist, licensed clinical pharmacist, licensed clinical pharmacist, licensed clinical pharmacist, licensed clinical pharmacist, licensed clinical pharmacist, licensed clinical pharmacist, licensed clinical pharmacist, licensed clinical pharmacist, licensed clinical pharmacist, licensed clinical pharmacist, registered pharmacist, registered
Clinical_pharmaceutical_scientist: clinical pharmaceutical scientists are a type of clinician. Clinical pharmaceutical scientists are a type of clinician.
Clinical_pharmaceutical_scientist: all clinical pharmaceutical scientists are pharmaceutical scientists.
Clinical_pharmaceutical_scientist: clinical pharmaceutical scientists are both practicing pharmacists and practicing pharmacists. Clinical pharmaceutical scientists are both practicing pharmacists and practicing pharmacists.
Clinical_pharmaceutical_scientist: clinical pharmaceutical scientist's clinical knowledge is clinical knowledge is broad and broad. clinical knowledge is broad and broad. clinical knowledge is broad and broad. is broad and broad. knowledge is broad and broad. is broad and broad. is broad and broad. is broad and broad. broad and broad. is is is broad and broad.
Clinical_pharmaceutical_scientist: clinical pharmaceutical scientists must possess expertise in the clinical pharmaceutical field. Clinical pharmaceutical scientists must possess expertise in the clinical pharmaceutical field.
Clinical_pharmaceutical_scientist: clinical pharmaceutical scientists are intimately familiar with the roles of clinical pharmaceutical scientists. In these roles, clinical pharmaceutical scientists are intimately familiar with the roles of clinical pharmaceutical scientists in clinical pharmaceutical roles.
Clinical_pharmaceutical_scientist: clinical pharmaceutical scientists in the pharmaceutical industry. Careers for clinical pharmaceutical scientists within the pharmaceutical industry. Careers for clinical pharmaceutical scientists within the pharmaceutical industry.
Clinical_pharmaceutical_scientist: Clinical pharmaceutical scientists work in the areas of clinical pharmaceutical science and medicine. Clinical pharmaceutical scientists work in the areas of clinical pharmaceutical science and medicine.
Clinical_pharmaceutical_scientist: clinical pharmaceutical scientists have expertise in both research and clinical pharmaceutical science. Clinical pharmaceutical scientists have expertise in both clinical and clinical pharmaceutical science.
Clinical_pharmaceutical_scientist: Clinical Pharmaceutical Scientists" "Central Issues Relevant to Clinical Pharmaceutical Scientists" "Central Issues Relevant to Clinical Pharmaceutical Scientists"
Bruce_McCandless_II: Bruce McCandless II. Bruce McCandless II. Bruce McCandless II. Bruce McCandless II. Bruce McCandless II. Bruce McCandless II. Bruce McCandless II. Bruce McCandless II. Bruce McCandless II. Bruce McCandless II. Bruce McCandless II. Bruce McCandless II. Bruce McCandless II. Bruce McCandless II. Bruce McCandless II. Bruce McCandless II. Bruce McCandless II. Bruce McCandless II. Bruce McCandless
Manned_Maneuvering_Unit: The Manned Maneuvering Unit is an astronaut propulsion unit. It is a spacecraft propulsion unit.
Manned_Maneuvering_Unit: of the NASA Manned Maneuvering System" "Assessment of the NASA Manned Maneuvering System"
Space_Shuttle: The Space Shuttle was a partially reusable space shuttle. was a partially reusable space shuttle.
Space_Shuttle: five complete Space Shuttle orbiter vehicles were completed. Five complete Space Shuttle orbiter vehicles were completed in total.
Space_Shuttle: was a total of 67 missions. was a total of 67 missions. The Space Shuttle fleet's total mission time was a total of 67 missions.
Space_Shuttle: The Space Shuttle was launched vertically, like a rocket, like a space shuttle. The Space Shuttle was launched vertically, like a rocket, like a rocket.
Space_Shuttle: The Space Shuttle was retired from service in 2001. The Space Shuttle was retired from service in 2001.
Space_Shuttle: the Space Shuttle Task Force launched the Space Shuttle Task Force in July 1969.
Space_Shuttle: Space Shuttle, STS-1, was launched in 1969. The first Space Shuttle mission, STS-1, would take place in 1969.
Space_Shuttle: 1981, the Space Shuttle launched on April 12, 1981.
Space_Shuttle: STS-4, NASA declared the Space Shuttle a Space Shuttle., NASA declared the Space Shuttle STS-4 a Space Shuttle.
Space_Shuttle: orbiter was designed for orbital orbit. Each Space Shuttle orbiter was designed for orbital orbit.
Space_Shuttle: The Space Shuttle's fly-by-wire control system was designed to control the space shuttle's flight-by-wire system.
Space_Shuttle: launched if the Shuttle was launched. if the Shuttle was launched if the Shuttle was launched if the Shuttle was launched if the Shuttle was launched if the Shuttle was launched if the Shuttle was launched if the Shuttle was launched if the Shuttle was launched if the Shuttle was launched if the Shuttle was launched if the Shuttle was launched if the Shuttle was launched if the Shuttle was launched if the Shuttle was launched if the Shuttle was launched if the Shuttle was launched if the Shuttle was launched.
Space_Shuttle: , the Space Shuttle arrived at one point., the Space Shuttle arrived at one point. After the Space Shuttle arrived at one point, the Space Shuttle landed at one point.
Space_Shuttle: The Space Shuttle was not launched under the Space Shuttle Program. The Space Shuttle was not launched under the Space Shuttle Program.
Space_Shuttle: the Space Shuttle reaches T+7 seconds. At approximately T+7 seconds, the Space Shuttle reaches T+7 seconds.
Space_Shuttle: The Space Shuttle continued its ascent using the Space Shuttle. The Space Shuttle continued its ascent using the Space Shuttle.
Space_Shuttle: the Space Shuttle remained stationary on missions the Space Shuttle had taken on. On missions the Space Shuttle remained stationary on earlier missions the Space Shuttle remained stationary on earlier missions the Space Shuttle remained stationary on earlier missions the Space Shuttle remained stationary on earlier missions the Space Shuttle remained stationary on earlier missions the Space Shuttle remained stationary on earlier missions the Space Shuttle remained stationary on earlier missions the Space Shuttle remained stationary on earlier missions the Space Shuttle remained stationary on earlier missions the Space Shuttle remained stationary on earlier missions the Space Shuttle remained
Space_Shuttle: The Space Shuttle has been featured as the Space Shuttle.
Space_Shuttle: The Space Shuttle also appears in a Space Shuttle ad.
Space_Shuttle_Challenger: was a fatality. was a fatality. The Challenger disaster was a fatality. The Challenger disaster was a fatality.
Archaeologist: archaeologists face many problems, and today, archaeologists face many problems.
Archaeologist: The OED first cites "archaeologist" from the OED. The OED first cites "archaeologist" from the OED.
Archaeologist: John Aubrey was a pioneer archaeologist. Aubrey was a pioneer archaeologist.
Archaeologist: archaeologists consider the use of a skeleton to be a useful tool, many archaeologists consider the use of skeletons to be a useful tool for archaeology, many archaeologists consider the use of skeletons to be a useful tool for archaeology, many archaeologists consider the use of skeletons to be a useful tool for archaeology, many archaeologists consider the use of skeletons to be a
Archaeologist: to deduce the earliest evidences. to deduce the earliest evidences.eologist to deduce the earliest evidences. the earliest evidences. This allows the archaeologist to deduce the earliest evidences from the archaeology. This allows the archaeologist to deduce the earliest evidences from the archaeology.
Archaeologist: have uncovered layouts of ancient sites. In the United Kingdom, archaeologists have uncovered layouts of ancient sites.
Archaeologist: are examining the remains of a Roman archaeological dig in downtown New York City, where archaeologists are examining the remains of a Roman archaeological dig in the heart of the city.
Archaeologist: eologists often examine archaeological sites. CRM archaeologists frequently examine archaeological sites. CRM archaeologists frequently examine archaeological sites.
Archaeologist: eologists face considerable time pressure.
Archaeologist: The job of archaeologist is depicted in the job of archaeologist. The job of archaeologist is depicted in the job of archaeologist.
Archaeologist: archaeologists refer to such off-the-mark archaeological marks as such as the "off-the-mark" archaeology.
Archaeologist: Archaeologists are also very much reliant on archaeologists. Archaeologists are also very much reliant on archaeologists for their work.
Archaeologist: ' work is the public.' work is the public.eologists' work is a popular audience for archaeologists' work.
Archaeologist: volunteer with professional USFS archaeologists. Volunteers work with professional USFS archaeologists.
Archaeologist: now make more archaeological discoveries. Where possible, archaeologists now make more archaeological discoveries.
Archaeologist: eologists are often assisted by archaeologists.
Archaeologist: American archaeologists have dug deep into the remains of ancient ruins. For years, archaeologists have dug deep into the remains of ancient ruins.
Archaeologist: Western archaeologists' views of the Roman Empire are distorted by Western archaeologists' views of the Roman Empire.
Archaeologist: to carry out archaeological investigations. to carry out archaeological investigations.eologists have also been obliged to carry out archaeological investigations. Archaeologists have also been obliged to carry out archaeological investigations.
Archaeologist: have explored this site extensively. have explored this site extensively.eologists have explored this site extensively. Australian archaeologists have explored this site extensively.
Archaeologist: archaeologists can help with archaeology. archaeologists can help with archaeology. Tribal elders cooperating with archaeologists can help with archaeology.
Astronaut: or cosmonaut is a person who is a part of the human race. An astronaut is a person who is a space traveler or cosmonaut.
Astronaut: "astronaut" in the early 1900's. An early use of "astronaut" in the early 1900's.
Astronaut: first astronauts for both space and space were the earliest astronauts for both space and space. The earliest astronauts for both space and space were the earliest astronauts for both space and space.
Astronaut: , NASA astronauts go through the selection process. selection process, NASA astronauts go through the selection process. selection process, astronauts go through the selection process.
Astronaut: -in-training may also experience short periods of training. training may also experience short periods of training.-in-training may also experience short periods of training.-in-training may also experience short periods of training. training. training. training. training. training. training. training. training. training.
Astronaut: also accumulate astronautics credits. Astronauts are also required to accumulate astronautics credits.
Astronaut: learn how to fly. Astronauts in training must learn how to fly.
Astronaut: Astronaut program is a program for Astronauts. is a program for Astronauts. The Educator Astronaut program is a program for Astronauts.
Astronaut: on longer space trips. Astronauts who took longer space trips took longer space trips. Astronauts who took longer space trips took longer space trips.
Astronaut: work with nutritionists to develop a diet. to develop a diet. Shuttle astronauts worked with nutritionists to develop a diet. Shuttle astronauts worked with nutritionists to develop a diet.
Astronaut: the ISS space station astronauts limit their space travel to the ISS.
Astronaut: at NASA, those who complete astronautic training are the ones who complete astronautic training. At NASA, those who complete astronautic training complete astronautic training.
Astronaut: astronauts who also have active-duty-duty astronauts and active-duty astronauts who also have active-duty-duty astronauts.
Astronomer: is a scientist in the field of astronomy. An astronomer is a scientist in the field of astronomy.
Astronomer: of topics or fields astronomers or astronomers Topics or fields astronomers or astronomers astronomers or astronomers astronomers or astronomers astronomers or astronomers astronomers or astronomers astronomers or astronomers astronomers or astronomers astronomers or astronomers astronomers or astronomers astronomers or astronomers astronomers or astronomers astronomers or astronomers astronomers or astronomers astronomers or astronom
Astronomer: of the two categories. Astronomers fall under either of these categories. Astronomers fall under either of the categories.
Astronomer: astronomers make direct observations of the sun. Observational astronomers make direct observations of the sun.
Astronomer: theoretical astronomers create and study the stars. study the sun. theoretical astronomers create and study the stars. In contrast, theoretical astronomers create and study the stars.
Astronomer: are highly educated individuals. Professional astronomers are highly educated individuals. Professional astronomers are highly educated individuals.
Astronomer: professional astronomers in the world. The number of professional astronomers in the world.
Astronomer: spend relatively little time studying the sun. Modern astronomers spend relatively little time studying the sun.
Astronomer: serve as faculty. time as faculty. Astronomers who serve as faculty spend time as faculty.
Astronomer: become astronomers. become astronomers. Those who become astronomers usually have a lot of luck.
Astronomer: astronomers get a PhD in astronomy. In college/university most astronomers get a PhD in astronomy.
Biochemist: are scientists that are trained to be scientists that are trained to be biochemists. Biochemists are scientists that are trained to be biochemists. Biochemists are scientists that are trained to be biochemists.
Biochemist: study DNA, proteins and cell membranes.ists study DNA, proteins and cell membranes.s study DNA, proteins and cell membranes. Biochemists study DNA, proteins and cell membranes. membranes. Biochemists study DNA, proteins and cell membranes. Biochemists study DNA, proteins and cell membranes. Biochemists study DNA, proteins and cell membranes. Biochemists study DNA, proteins and cell membranes. Biochemists study DNA, proteins and membrane
Biochemist: The word "biochemist" is a portmanteau. The word "biochemist" is a portmanteau.
Biochemist: also research how certain chemical reactions are made. Biochemists also research how certain chemical reactions are made. Biochemists also research how certain chemical reactions are made.
Biochemist: biochemists focus on planning and and planning for biochemist research. for biochemist research. Biochemist researchers focus on planning and planning. Biochemist researchers focus on planning and planning for biochemist research.
Biochemist: biochemists also have to have the biochemistry. the biochemistry. biochemists also have to have the biochemistry. Biochemists also have to have the biochemistry. Biochemists also have to have the biochemistry.
Biochemist: Biochemists must also prepare technical reports. Biochemists must also prepare technical reports. Biochemists must also prepare technical reports.
Biochemist: In biochemistry, researchers break down molecules into smaller molecules. In biochemistry, researchers break down molecules into smaller molecules.
Biochemist: Biochemists in the field of agriculture. agriculture. Biochemists in the field of agriculture..................... Biochemists in the field of agriculture. Biochemists in the field of agriculture. Biochemists in the field of agriculture. Biochemists in the field of agriculture.....
Biochemist: also prepare pharmaceutical compounds for use in pharmaceuticals. Biochemists also prepare pharmaceutical compounds for use in pharmaceuticals.
Biochemist: biochemistry is a sub-discipline of modern biochemistry.. is a sub-discipline of modern biochemistry. Modern biochemistry is considered a sub-discipline of modern biochemistry. Modern biochemistry is considered a sub-discipline of modern biochemistry.
Biochemist: biochemist was coined, biochemists have been a biochemists since the late 1800s. Biochemists have been biochemists since the late 1800s.
Biochemist: biochemistry or a related field. or a related field. A degree in biochemistry or a related field. A degree in biochemistry or a related field. A degree in biochemistry or a related field. A degree in biochemistry or a related field. A degree in biochemistry or a related field. A degree in biochemistry or a related field. A degree in biochemistry or a related field. A degree in biochemistry or a related field. A degree in biochemistry or a related
Biochemist: Biochemists must pass a qualifying exam. a qualifying exam. Biochemists must pass a qualifying exam. Biochemists must pass a qualifying exam. Biochemists must pass a qualifying exam. Biochemists must pass a qualifying exam...
Biochemist: biochemistry requires an understanding of organics. Biochemistry requires an understanding of organics. Biochemistry requires an understanding of organics.
Biochemist: biochemists must also be familiar with biochemists must also be familiar with biochemists must also be familiar with biochemists must also be familiar with biochemists must be familiar with biochemists must also be familiar with biochemists must be familiar with biochemists must be familiar with biochemists must be familiar with biochemists must be familiar with biochemists must be familiar with biochemists must be familiar with biochemists must be familiar with biochemistry must
Biochemist: biochemistry biochemistry, biochemistry, and a biochemistry background, biochemistry, biochemistry, biochemistry, biochemistry, biochemistry, biochemistry, biochemistry, biochemistry, biochemistry, biochemistry, biochemistry biochemistry, biochemistry, biochemistry, biochemistry, biochemistry, biochemistry, in biochemistry, in biochemistry, biochemistry, biochemistry, biochemistry, biochemistry bio
Biochemist: a biochemist is $26,080. a biochemist is $26,080. The average income of a biochemist is $26,080. The average income of a biochemist is $26,080. The average income of a biochemist is $26,080.
Chemist: the science involved with the study of chemistry. Chemistry is the scientific discipline involved with the study of chemistry.
Chemist: chemistry explains aspects of a chemical reaction. For example, chemistry explains aspects of a chemical reaction.
Chemist: such as how to make a molecule. Chemistry addresses topics such as how to make a molecule.
Chemist: was called a 'chemist'.. was a 'chemist'. An alchemist was called a 'chemist'.
Chemist: chemistry. Traditional chemistry starts with the study of the atoms. Traditional chemistry starts with the study of the atoms.
Chemist: The chemistry laboratory stereotypically uses various chemistry laboratory equipment. The chemistry laboratory stereotypically uses various chemistry laboratory equipment.
Chemist: s specialize in one or more areas. two areas.s specialize in one or more areas.s specialize in one or more areas.s specialty.s specialty. two areas. Most chemists specialize in one or more areas.
Chemist: s specialize in exploring physical chemists' interests. chemistry.s specialize in exploring physical chemistry.s specialize in exploring physical chemistry.s specialize in exploring physical chemistry. chemists specialize in exploring physical chemistry. physical chemistry.
Chemist: was preceded by its protoscience, protoscience, and protochemistry. Its protoscience was preceded by its protoscience, and its protoscience was preceded by its protoscience, and protochemistry was preceded by its protoscience, and protochemistry was preceded by its protoscience, and protochemistry was preceded by its protoscience, and protochemistry was preceded by its protoscience, and protochemistry was preceded by its protoscience, and protochemistry was preceded by its protoscience, and protoscience.
Chemist: a body of of chemistry as a body of chemistry as a body of chemistry as a body of chemistry as a body of chemistry as a body of chemistry as a body of chemistry as a body of chemistry as a body of chemistry as a body of chemistry as a body of chemistry as a body of chemistry as a body of chemistry as a body of chemistry as a body of chemistry as a body of
Chemist: and alchemy are both disciplines, alchemy and chemistry are both disciplines. While alchemy and chemistry are both disciplines, alchemy and chemistry are not.
Chemist: Chemistry is considered to have become a science. a science that is considered to have become a science. Chemistry is considered to have become a science. Chemistry is considered to have become a science.
Chemist: The history of chemistry is intertwined with the history of chemistry. The history of chemistry is intertwined with the history of chemistry.
Chemist: Christopher Glaser was born in 1663. In 1663, the chemist Christopher Glaser was born in 1663.
Chemist: The Scottish chemist Joseph Black and the Scottish chemist The Scottish chemist Joseph Black and the Scottish chemist The Scottish chemist Joseph Black and the Scottish chemist The Scottish chemist Joseph Black and the Scottish chemist The Scottish chemist Joseph Black and the Scottish chemist The Scottish chemist Joseph Black and the Scottish chemist Joseph Black and the Scottish chemist Joseph Black and the Scottish chemist Joseph Black and the Scottish chemist Joseph Black and the Scottish chemist Joseph Black
Chemist: Justus Justus. Justus Organic chemistry was developed by Justus Justus. Organic chemistry was developed by Justus.
Chemist: chemistry is the analysis of a chemical reaction. Analytical chemistry is the analysis of a chemical reaction.
Chemist: chemistry incorporates standardized experimental methods. Analytical chemistry incorporates standardized experimental methods.
Chemist: of the chemical reactions that occur in the body. Biochemistry is the study of the chemical reactions that occur in the body.
Chemist: Biochemistry and organic chemistry are closely related. Biochemistry and organic chemistry are closely related.
Chemist: is also associated with molecular biology. Biochemistry is also associated with molecular biology. Biochemistry is also associated with molecular biology.
Chemist: the study of organic compounds. the study of organic compounds. is the study of organic compounds. Inorganic chemistry is the study of the study of organic compounds.
Chemist: is the preparation, characterization, and analysis of materials. Materials chemistry is the preparation, characterization, and analysis of materials.
Chemist: of chemical substances. Neurochemistry is the study of neurochemicals; a study of neurochemicals; a study of neurochemicals; a study of neurochemicals; a study of neurochemicals; a study of neurochemicals; a study of neurochemicals; a study of neurochemicals; a study of neurochemicals; a study of neurochemicals; a study of neurochemicals; a study of neurochemicals; a study of neurochemicals; a
Chemist: the study of nuclear chemistry. It is the study of the study of the chemistry of the nuclear material.
Chemist: organic chemistry is the study of organic chemistry. Organic chemistry is the study of organic chemistry.
Chemist: the study of the physical chemistry of the body. It is the study of the physical properties of the body.
Chemist: chemistry has large overlap with physics. Physical chemistry has large overlap with physics.
Chemist: the use of a variety of substances. Physical chemistry involves the use of a variety of substances.
Chemist: chemistry is a distinct discipline. chemistry is a distinct discipline. chemistry is a distinct discipline. Physical chemistry is a distinct discipline.
Chemist: chemistry is the study of the chemical properties of the material. Theoretical chemistry is the study of the chemical properties of the material.
Chemist: al chemistry has large overlap with theoretical chemistry. Theoretical chemistry has large overlap with theoretical chemistry.
Chemist: include inorganic chemistry, of organic chemistry, and inorganic chemistry, the study of organic chemistry. These include inorganic chemistry, the study of inorganic chemistry, the study of inorganic chemistry, the study of inorganic chemistry, the study of inorganic chemistry, the study of inorganic chemistry, the study of inorganic chemistry, the study of inorganic chemistry, the study of inorganic chemistry, the study of inorgan
Chemist: neurochemistry the chemical study of the neurochemistry the chemical study of the neurochemistry the chemical study of the neurochemistry the chemical study of the neurochemistry the chemical study of the neurochemistry the chemical study of the neurochemistry the chemical study of the neurochemistry the chemical study of the neurochemistry the chemical study of the neurochemistry the chemical study of the neurochemistry the chemical study of the neurochemistry the chemical study of the neurochemistry the chemical study of the neurochemistry the chemical study of the neurochemistry the chemical study of the neurochemistry the chemical study of the
Chemist: chemistry. chemistry. chemistry. chemistry., and astrochemistry., and astrochemistry., and astrochemistry. Other fields include agrochemistry, astrochemistry, and astrochemistry.
Chemist: and Voet Biochemistry ISBN 978-0-823-88-039-0.
Chemist: ISBN 0-19-879285-9 Atkins, G. A., et al. ISBN 0-19-879285-9 Atkins, G. A. Physical Chemistry ISBN 0-19-879285-9 Atkins, G. A. Physical Chemistry ISBN 0-19-879285-9 Atkins, G. A. Physical Chemistry ISBN 0-19-879285-9 Atkins, G. A. Physical Chemistry ISBN 0-19-879285-9 Atkins, G. A. Physical Chemistry
Ecologist: for ecologists is the importance of focusing on the impact of the environment on the environment.
Ecologist: Ecologists seek to explain:, interactions, and interactions. Ecologists seek to explain: Life processes, interactions, interactions, interactions, and interactions.
Ecologist: ecological classifications. Hence, ecologists classify ecosystems hierarchically by their ecological classification.
Ecologist: plant ecologists use pollen records that to determine the quality of pollen. ecologists use pollen records that are used by plant ecologists to determine the quality of pollen.
Ecologist: Ecologists use computer programs to study the environment. and computer programs to study the environment. Ecologists use computer programs to study the environment. and human-computer interfaces to study the environment. Ecologists use a mixture of computer programs and computer programs to study the environment. Ecologists use a mixture of computer programs and computer programs to study the environment. Ecologists use a mixture of computer programs and computer programs to study the environment. Ecologists use a mixture of computer programs and computer programs to study the environment.
Ecologist: community ecology study the determinants of community ecology. Community ecologists study the determinants of community ecology.
Ecologist: Ecosystem ecologist attempt to determine the ecological system ecologist attempt to determine the ecological system ecologist attempt to determine the ecological system ecologist attempt to determine the ecological system ecologist attempt to determine the ecological system ecologist attempt to determine the ecological system ecologist attempt to determine the ecological system ecologist attempt to determine the ecological system ecologist attempt to determine the ecological system ecologist attempt to determine the ecological system ecologist attempt to determine the ecological system
Ecologist: to question the validity of the ecologists' findings. to question the validity of ecologists' findings.
Ecologist: , ecologists have identified principles that are based on these principles. From these principles, ecologists have identified a number of ecological principles.
Ecologist: , marine biologist and ecologist,,, marine biologist and ecologist,,,,, John F. Kennedy, died.,,,,,,,,,,,,,, marine biologist and ecologist,,,,, ecologist, and marine biologist, John F. Kennedy, died.,, John F. Kennedy, died.
Ecologist: , ecologists have worked to improve the environment. Since then, ecologists have worked to improve the environment.
Geographer: are trained in geography, few are trained in geography. Although many geographers are trained in geography, many are not.
Geographer: Geographers study the space and the time. Geographers study the space and the time.
Geographer: , geographers use four methods: four methods: a geographer uses four methods: a geographer uses four methods: a geographer uses four methods: a geographer uses four methods: a geographer uses four methods: a geographer uses four methods: a geographer uses four methods: a geographer uses four methods: a geographer uses four methods: a geographer uses four methods: a geographer uses four methods: a geographer uses four methods: a geographer
Geographer: Most geographers will cite a childhood childhood.......... A childhood. A childhood. A childhood. A childhood. A childhood. A childhood. A childhood. A childhood. A childhood. A childhood. A childhood. A childhood. A childhood. A childhood. A childhood. A childhood. A childhood. A childhood. A childhood. A childhood. A childhood. A childhood. A childhood. A childhood.. A childhood. A childhood. A childhood
Geographer: increasingly use remotely sensed data. Geographers increasingly use remotely sensed data to better understand geographers work. Geographers increasingly use remotely sensed data to better understand geographers work.
Geographer: are making notable contributions to the field of geographers. Geographers are making notable contributions to the field of geographers.
Geographer: such as Liu An, Liu An, Liu An, Liu An, Liu An, Liu An, Liu An, Liu An, Liu An, Liu An, Liu An, Liu An, Liu An, Liu An, Liu An, Liu An, Liu An, Liu An, Liu An, Liu An, Liu An, Liu An, Liu An, Liu An, Liu An, Liu An, Liu An, Liu
Geographer: such as Muhammad bin Salman such as Muhammad bin Salman, Muhammad bin Salman, Muhammad bin Salman, Muhammad bin Salman, Muhammad bin Salman, Muhammad bin Salman, Muhammad bin Salman, Muhammad bin Salman, Muhammad bin Salman, Muhammad bin Salman, Muhammad bin Salman, Muhammad bin Salman, Muhammad bin Salman, Muhammad bin Salman, Muhammad bin Salman, Muhammad bin Salman, Muhammad bin Salman, Muhammad bin Salman, Muhammad bin Salman, Muhammad bin Salman, Muhammad bin Sal
Geographer: a drawing from a drawing by a geographer, Mahmud al-Kashgari, a geographer from Turkey. Mahmud al-Kashgari, a geographer, drew a drawing from a drawing by a geographer, Mahmud al-Kashgari.
Geographer:  human geographer and human geographer Walter Christaller  human geographer and human geographer Walter Christaller  human geographer and human geographer Walter Christaller  human geographer and human geographer Walter Christaller  human geographer and human geographer Walter Christaller  human geographer and human geographer Walter Christaller  human geographer Walter Christaller  human geographer and human geographer Walter Christaller  human geographer Walter Christaller  human geographer Walter Christaller  human ge
Geographer: David Harvey  Marxist geographer and historian. David Harvey  Marxist geographer and historian.
Oceanographer: is a person who studies the oceans. An oceanographer is a person who studies the oceans.
Paleontologist: sttten paleontologists to examine paleontological features.sttten are lagersttten, die Palontologists to examine paleontological features.
Paleontologist: paleontologists generally use approaches based on paleontological approaches. Paleontologists generally use approaches based on paleontological methods based on paleontological methods.
Paleontologist: paleontologists have mistakenly assigned parts of the paleontological record to paleontologists. So paleontologists have mistakenly assigned parts of the paleontological record to paleontologists.
Pathology: Pathology is the study of the body. Pathology is the study of the body. Pathology is the study of the body.
Pathology: pathology. The word pathology also refers to pathology, which is a disease that is a disease that is a disease that is a disease. Pathology refers to the pathology of a disease. Pathology refers to the pathology of a disease. Pathology refers to the pathology of a disease. Pathology refers to the pathology of a disease. Pathology refers to the pathology of a disease. Pathology refers to the pathology of a disease
Pathology: pathology" may also refer to "a pathology" idiomatically, "a pathology" may also refer to "a pathology" idiomatically, "a pathology" may also refer to "a pathology" idiomatically, "a pathology" may also refer to "a pathology" idiomatically, "a pathology" may also refer to "a pathology" or "a disease" idiomatically
Pathology: pathology is called a physician practicing pathology. A physician practicing pathology is called a physician practicing pathology.
Pathology: , general pathology is the most common pathology in general practice. In common medical practice, general pathology is the most common pathology.
Pathology: Pathology is a significant field in the field of Pathology. Pathology is a significant field in the field of Pathology.
Pathology: Pathology began to develop as a field of pathology in the early 1900s. Pathology began to develop as a field of pathology in the early 1900s.
Pathology: pathology. pathology. pathology. pathology as a formal area pathology. pathology. of pathology. pathology as a formal area. pathology as formal area. Pathology as formal area.. pathology. pathology. pathology. pathology. pathology. pathology. pathology as a formal area. of pathology. of pathology. Pathology as a formal area of pathology.
Pathology: Anatomical pathology is itself divided into two main categories: Anatomical pathology and anatomical pathology. Anatomical pathology is itself divided into two categories: Anatomical pathology and anatomical pathology.
Pathology: Anatomical pathology is one of two pathologies. Anatomical pathology is one of two pathologies. Anatomical pathology is one of two pathologies. Anatomical pathology is one of two pathologies.
Pathology: is generally used on samples. Cytopathology is generally used on samples.
Pathology: . the medical field. forensic pathology. the treatment of patients with forensic pathology. the treatment of patients with forensic pathology.forensic pathology. the treatment of patients with forensic pathology. the treatment of patients with forensic pathology.
Pathology: clinical medicine, histopathology refers to the pathology of a patients histopathology. In clinical medicine, histopathology refers to the pathology of a patients histopathology.
Pathology: Neuropathology is a subspecialty of neuropathology. Anatomical neuropathology is a subspecialty of neuropathology.
Pathology: neuropathology is a medical specialty in many English-speaking countries. In many English-speaking countries, neuropathology is a medical specialty.
Pathology: who specializes in neuropathology. who specializes in neuropathology. A physician who specializes in neuropathology.
Pathology: Surgical pathology involves the gross and the groin and the iliac lobes. Surgical pathology involves the gross and iliac lobes.
Pathology: immune system, the study of an organism's immune system, the study of an organism's immune system, the study of its immune system, and the study of its immunopathology, the study of an organism's immune system, the study of its immune system, and the study of its immunopathology, the study of an organism's immune system, and the study of its immunopathology, the study of its immune system, and the study of its immunopathology, the study of an organism's immune system.
Pathology: , hematopathology is the medical term for hematopathology. In the United States, hematopathology is the medical term for hematopathology.
Pathology: is multidisciplinary by nature. Molecular pathology is multidisciplinary by nature. Molecular pathology is multidisciplinary by nature. Molecular pathology is multidisciplinary by nature.
Pathology: and molecular pathology: The crossover between molecular pathology and molecular pathology. The crossover between molecular pathology and molecular pathology. The crossover between molecular pathology and molecular pathology. The crossover between molecular pathology and molecular pathology. The crossover between molecular pathology and molecular pathology. The crossover between molecular pathology and molecular pathology. The crossover between molecular pathology and molecular pathology.
Pathology: Molecular pathology is commonly used in cellular pathology. Molecular pathology is commonly used in cellular pathology.
Pathology: Molecular Pathology is primarily used to diagnose and treat cellular pathology. Molecular Pathology is primarily used to diagnose and treat cellular pathology.
Pathology: Pathology is widely used for pathology. Pathology is widely used for pathology.
Pathology: of Pathology. of Pathology. The American Osteopathic Board of Pathology. The American Osteopathic Board of Pathology. The American Osteopathic Board of Pathology. The American Osteopathic Board of Pathology. The American Osteopathic Board of Pathology. The American Osteopathic Board of Pathology. The American Osteopathic Board of Pathology. The American Osteopathic Board of Pathology. The American Osteopathic Board of Pathology. The American Osteopathic Board of Pathology.
Pathology: full-time training in histopathology currently lasts for two years. Full-time training in histopathology currently lasts for two years.
Pathology: pathology is divided into two main categories: pathology and pathology. In France, pathology is divided into two categories: pathology and pathology.
Pathology: is open to all. is open to all. Residency in anatomical pathology is open to all. Residency in anatomical pathology is open to all. Residency in anatomical pathology is open to all.
Pathology: pathology methods are of great importance. great importance. General pathology methods are of great importance.
Pathology: pathology research has been conducted. has been conducted. remains ongoing. remains ongoing. has been conducted. remains ongoing. remains ongoing. However, significant amounts of pathology research remains.
Pathology: In human medical pathology, the pathology of disease is a human disease.
Physicist: the mathematical physicist Roger Penrose. The mathematical physicist Roger Penrose had been a physicist for over a century.
Physicist: Applied physicists use physics in scientific research. physics in scientific research. Applied physicists use physics in scientific research. Applied physicists use physics in scientific research.
Physicist: experimental physicists involved in basic research.. Experimental physicists involved in basic research. Experimental physicists involved in basic research. Experimental physicists involved in basic research.
Physicist: particle physicists design and develop particle physics. develop particle physics. In addition, particle physicists design and develop particle physics. In addition, particle physicists design and develop particle physics.
Geologist: is a scientist who studies the earth. A geologist is a scientist who studies the earth.
Geologist: Geologists usually study geology. Geologists usually study geology, although backgrounds are usually geological. Geologists usually study geology, although backgrounds are usually geological.
Geologist: Geologists work in the energy and water. and water. Geologists work in the energy and water.
Geologist: the field of geology. Geologists are also important contributors to the field of geology. Geologists are also important contributors to the field of geology.
Geologist: Geologists need skills in geology. Most geologists also need skills in geology.
Geologist: often take geology courses. courses. Many non-geologists often take geology courses. Many non-geologists often take geology courses.
Geologist: . An engineering geologist is employed to provide engineering geology services to the engineering and engineering communities.
Geologist: Exploration geologists use all aspects of the geology of exploration geologists use all aspects of the geology of exploration geologists use all aspects of the geology of exploration geologists use all aspects of the geology of exploration geologists use all aspects of the geology of exploration geologists use all aspects of the geology of exploration geologists use all aspects of the geology of exploration geologists use all aspects of the geology of exploration geologists use all aspects of the geology of exploration geologists use all aspects of the geology of exploration
Geologist: usually hold an undergraduate degree. an undergraduate degree. in the field of geology usually hold an undergraduate degree. Geologists in academia usually hold an undergraduate degree.
Geoprofessions: Geoprofessions is a term coined by the Geoprofessions Association of America. Geoprofessions is a term coined by the Geoprofessions Association of America.
Petroleum_geologist: is an earth scientist. A petroleum geologist is an earth scientist who is a petroleum geologist. A petroleum geologist is an earth scientist who is a petroleum geologist.
Petroleum_geologist: petroleum geologists are usually linked to the petroleum industry. Petroleum geologists are usually linked to the petroleum industry.
Petroleum_geologist: Petroleum geologists look at the structural and geophysical aspects of the petroleum industry. Petroleum geologists look at the structural and geophysical aspects of the petroleum industry.
Petroleum_geologist: determine a prospect's viability looking at a prospect's prospect. determine a prospect's viability looking at a prospect. a prospect's viability looking at a prospect's viability. Petroleum geologists determine a prospect's viability looking at a prospect's viability looking at a prospect's viability looking at a prospect's viability looking at a prospect's viability. Petroleum geologists determine a prospect's viability looking at
Urban_planner: planner or an urban planning planner. An urban planner or an urban planning planner or an urban planning planner.
Urban_planner: An urban planner may focus on a specific area. may focus on a specific area. An urban planner may focus on a specific area. An urban planner may focus on a specific area. An urban planner may focus on a specific area.
Urban_planner: urban planning. urban planning. An urban planner may also specialize in urban planning. An urban planner may also specialize in urban planning.
Urban_planner: The urban planner is tasked with preparing the urban plan for the urban planner. The urban planner is tasked with preparing the urban plan for the urban planner.
Urban_planner: for the urban planner. The urban planner will also be responsible for the urban planner.
Urban_planner: a city planner. with a task of identifying the best way to achieve this. An urban planner will be tasked with identifying the best way to achieve this. An urban planner will be tasked with identifying the best way to achieve this. An urban planner will be tasked with identifying the best way to achieve this.
Urban_planner: the jurisdiction, the urban planner may also be required to provide a detailed urban plan. Depending on the jurisdiction, the urban planner may also need to provide a detailed urban plan.
Urban_planner: urban planners can require urban planners to require urban planning permits. In many jurisdictions urban planners can require urban planners to require permits for urban planning.
Urban_planner: the urban planner is a role that the urban planner plays in the city's planning process.
Urban_planner: urban planner will be responsible for the urban planning. The urban planner will be responsible for the urban planner's role in the urban planning process.
Urban_planner: The urban planner for an urban revitalization project. The urban planner for an urban revitalization project.
Urban_planner: urban planner will be responsible for the urban planning. The urban planner will be responsible for the urban planner's role in the urban planning process.
Urban_planner: an urban planner may consider urban planning a form of urban planning., an urban planner may consider urban planning a form of urban planning.
Anthropologist: is a person engaged in research and development. An anthropologist is a person engaged in research and development.
Anthropologist: are typically graduate students. Anthropologists hold graduate degrees, either from the University of Washington or from a recognized university.
Anthropologist: hold undergraduate degrees in anthropology. Some anthropologists hold undergraduate degrees in anthropology.
Anthropologist: employment of anthropologists and archaeologists in the and archaeologists in the U.S. employment of anthropologists and archaeologists in the U.S. employment of anthropologists and archaeologists in the U.S. employment of anthropologists and archaeologists in the U.S.
Anthropologist: anthropologists is $26,080, the median salary for anthropologists in the United States is $26,080. The median salary for anthropologists in the United States is $26,080.
Anthropologist: anthropologists report an above average above average anthropological grade of anthropology.
Anthropologist: . The role of an anthropologist is different. The role of an anthropologist is different.
Anthropologist: anthropologists focus their studies on anthropology, anthropologists focus on anthropology. While anthropologists focus their studies on anthropology, anthropologists focus their studies on anthropology.
Anthropologist: forensic anthropologists help victims of crime to understand their past and present. In this role, forensic anthropologists help victims of crime to understand their past and present.
Anthropologist: forensic anthropologists tend to gravitate towards forensic anthropologists. forensic anthropologists tend to gravitate toward forensic anthropologists. However, forensic anthropologists tend to gravitate toward forensic anthropologists.
Anthropologist: forensic anthropologists typically hold doctorates, but some hold masters degrees.
Anthropologist: in this field primarily study the history of the field. Anthropologists in this field primarily study the history of the field.
Anthropologist: anthropologists also study digital and cyber anthropology. Cyberanthropologists also study digital and cyber anthropology.
Anthropologist: cyberanthropologists study the co-evolutionary relationship between cyber anthropologists and cyber anthropologists. Cyber anthropologists study the co-evolutionary relationship between cyber anthropologists and cyber anthropologists.
Anthropologist: studies different forms of cultural anthropology. studies different forms of cultural anthropology. A cultural anthropologist studies different forms of cultural anthropology.
Economist: that previous economists have been wrong. He affirmed that previous economists have been wrong.
Economist: he argues that among economists more generally, it argues that among economists more generally, it argues that the economics of the economy are more complex than that of the economists.
Economist: Lincoln Simon has criticized the Economist Julian Lincoln Simon for his criticism of the Economist Julian Lincoln Simon.
Economist: presented variations on the classics of classical economics.
Economist: categorize market failures differently. categorize market failures differently, economists generally agree that market failures are not necessarily market failures.
Economist: the middle class, the middle class is a good idea. think that crowding out the middle class is the key to reducing the number of people in the workforce.
Economist: draw on the tools of economics to draw on the tools of economics to draw on the tools of economics to draw on the tools of economics to draw on the tools of economics to draw on the tools of economics to draw on the tools of economics to draw on the tools of economics to draw on the tools of economics to draw on the tools of economics to draw on the tools of economics to draw on the tools of economics to draw on the tools of economics to draw on the tools of economics to
Economist: be expected to be professional economists. Professional economists are expected to be economists. Professional economists are expected to be economists.
Economist: , professional economists are primarily employed in the private sector. In the public sector, professional economists are employed by the private sector.
Economist: also work for various government agencies. also work for various government agencies. also work for various government agencies. agencies. Economists also work for various government agencies. Economists also work for various government agencies. Economists also work for various government agencies. Economists also work for various government agencies. Economists also work for various government agencies. Economists also work for various government agencies. Economists also work for various government agencies.
Political_scientist: scientists seek to advance positive political science. Some political scientists seek to advance positive political science to advance positive political science.
Political_scientist: provide the frameworks from which to draw the frameworks from which to draw the frameworks. Political scientists provide the frameworks from which to draw the frameworks from which to draw the frameworks.
Political_scientist: Chaturvedy, Political scientists may serve as a useful tool for political scientists. Chaturvedy, Political scientists may serve as a useful tool for political scientists.
Political_scientist: Political scientists can be found working in the political sciences. Political scientists can be found working in the political sciences.
Political_scientist: , political scientists are known as political scientists., political scientists are also known as political scientists. In the United States, political scientists known as political scientists are political scientists known as political scientists.
Political_scientist: political scientists have historically been political scientists. Because of this, political scientists have historically been political scientists.
Political_scientist: "political scientist" is actually a scientific term. In fact, the designation "political scientist" is actually a scientific term.
Political_scientist: accused political scientists of being "false" and "false"
Political_scientist: "Ten Things Political Scientists Know" Noel, Hans "Ten Things Political Scientists Know" Noel, Hans "Ten Things Political Scientists Know" Noel, Hans "Ten Things Political Scientists Know" Noel, Hans "Ten Things Political Scientists Know" Noel, Hans "Ten Things Political Scientists Know"
Sociologist: that a sociologists conduct research that that that some sociologists conduct research that that a sociologists conduct research that some sociologists conduct research that some sociologists conduct research that some sociologists conduct that some sociologists conduct research that some sociologists conduct research that some sociologists conduct research that some sociologists conduct research that some sociologists conduct research that some sociologists conduct research that some sociologists conduct research that some sociologists conduct research that some. some is
Sociologist: that theorised social behaviour is a'social phenomenon'.
Sociologist: were limited to the field of sociology. Few early sociologists were confined strictly to the field of sociology.
Sociologist: work include some important sociologists associated with this topic. Some important sociologists associated with this topic include some important sociologists associated with this topic.
Sociologist: James G. March and James G. March are the two leading sociologists in the field of organizational sociology, with a specialization in the field of organizational sociology.
Sociologist: the observation research, a sociologist anthropologist, a sociologist and a sociology professor participated in the observation research.
Sociologist: some sociologists employ historical-comparative or comparative methods.-comparative methods. some sociologists employ historical-comparative methods. comparative methods. Some sociologists employ historical-comparative methods.
Sociologist: of sociologists. It is the remit of sociologists. It is the remit of sociologists. It is the remit of sociologists. It is the remit of sociologists. It is the remit of sociologists. It is the remit of sociologists. It is the remit of sociologists. It is the remit of sociologists. It is the remit of sociologists. It is the remit of sociologists. It is the remit of socio
Sociologist: environmental sociologist and environmentalist, and environmentalist, Richard Sullivan, by prominent environmental sociologist and environmentalist, Richard Sullivan. As argued by notable environmental sociologist and environmentalist, sociologist Richard Sullivan.
Sociologist: today political sociologists are as likely to be politically sociologists today as they are today to be political sociologists.
Sociologist: sociologists study inter-state relations. Contemporary political sociologists study inter-state relations.
Sociologist: sociologists often use sociology to study sociology. Within this field, sociologists often use sociology to study sociology.
Sociologist: also study Sociology. Sociologists in this field also study Sociology in this field also study Sociology in this field also study Sociology in this field also study Sociology in this field also study Sociology in this field also study Sociology in this field also study Sociology in this field also study Sociology in this field also study Sociology in this field also study Sociology in this field also study Sociology in this field also study Sociology in this field also study Sociology in this field also study Sociology in this field also study Sociology
Sociologist: Of special concern to psychological sociologists. Of special concern to psychological sociologists. Of special concern to psychological sociologists. Of special concern to psychological sociologists. Of special concern to psychological sociologists. Of special concern to psychological sociologists.
Sociologist: , German sociologist Ferdinand Tnnies, for instance, cited the German sociologist Ferdinand Tnnies as a key figure in the German sociologist's work on the social and economics of socialism.
Sociologist: For example, a sociologist might study the relationship between social science and economics. For example, a sociologist might study the relationship between social science and economics. For example, a sociologist might study the relationship between social science and economics.
Sociologist: sociology would be more interested in the applied sociologist. The applied socioologist would be more interested in the applied sociologist.
Sociologist: , like sociologists, are also practitioners of social anthropology.
Historian: is a person who has written a book about a person or a place. An historian is a person who has written a book about a person or place.
Historian: s are concerned with the continuous, the continuous, the continuous, the continuous, the continuous, the continuous, the continuous, the continuous, the continuous, the continuous, the continuous, the continuous, the continuous, the continuous, the continuous, the continuous, the continuous, the continuous, the continuous, the continuous, the continuous, the continuous, the continuous, the continuous, the continuous, the continuous, the continuous, the continuous, the continuous, the continuous, the continuous, the continuous, the continuous, the continuous, the continuous, the continuous,
Historian: are recognized by publications.. are recognized by publications. Some historians are recognized by publications. Some historians are recognized by publications.
Historian: in the late 1950s. the profession in the early 1960s. "Historian" became a profession in the late 1950s.
Historian: include: John F. Kennedy, John F. Kennedy, and John F. Kennedy. Famous historians in this tradition include:
Historian: historian, and a Scottish historian, and a Scottish historian, and a Scottish historian, and and a Scottish author, and, and a Scottish historian, and and, and a Scottish author, and author of The Scottish author of The Scottish author of The Scottish and and author. and and author. and author. and author. and and and and and and historian of Scotland. and and author
Historian: Another important French historian of the era, of the great French historian of the era, historian of the era, historian of the era, historian of the era, historian of the era, historian of the era, historian of the era, historian of the era, historian of the era, historian of the era, historian of the era, historian of the era, historian of the era, historian of the era, historian of the era, historian of the era, historian of the
Historian: s had focused on cyclical events. events.s had focused on cyclical events. events. events. events. events. events. Previous historians had focused on cyclical events. Previous historians had focused on cyclical events.
Historian: Whigs Whigs as a group. Whigs were a minority. Whigs Whigs. Whigs. Whigs as a group. Whigs were a group of Whigs who fought for the Whigs.
Historian: A circle of historians inside the museum. A circle of historians inside the museum.
Historian: are employed at universities.. are employed at universities. are employed at universities. are employed at universities. are employed at universities.. are employed at universities. are employed at universities. Many historians are employed at universities.... are employed at universities... Many historians are employed at universities. Many historians are employed at universities.. Many historians are employed at universities. Many historians are employed at universities.
Historian: . of the subjects still gain recognition.s still gain recognition..s still gain recognition. However, some historians still gain recognition.
Historian: : The Education of Historians for Twenty-first Century. The Education of Historians for Twenty-first Century.
Historian: the Modern Age: The the Great Historians of the Modern Age: The Great Historians of the Modern Age: The Great Historians of the Modern Age: The Great Historians of the Modern Age: The Great Historians of the Modern Age: The Great Historians of the Modern Age: The Great Historians of the Modern Age: The Great Historians of the Modern Age: The Great Historians of the Modern Age: The Great Historians of
Historian: s and historicals and Historical Historians. Encyclopedia of Historians and Historical Historians.
Lists_of_occupations: occupations grouped by occupation. The following are lists of occupations grouped by occupation.
Isaac_Newton: Sir Isaac Newton was an Englishman. Sir Isaac Newton was an Englishman. Sir Isaac Newton was an Englishman.
Isaac_Newton: Isaac Newton, was born in Newton, Massachusetts. the same name. Isaac Newton was born in Newton, Massachusetts. Isaac Newton was born in Newton, Massachusetts. Isaac Newton. Isaac Newton. been born in Newton, Massachusetts. His father, Isaac Newton, also named Isaac Newton, had a son, Isaac Newton. Isaac Newton was born in Newton, Massachusetts.
Isaac_Newton: Isaac Newton, looking at a statue of Isaac Newton. Isaac Newton. A statue of Isaac Newton, looking at a statue of Isaac Newton. A statue of Isaac Newton, looking at a statue of Isaac Newton, looking at a statue of Isaac Newton, looking at a statue of Isaac Newton, looking at a statue of Isaac Newton, looking at a statue of Isaac Newton, looking at a statue of Isaac Newton, looking at a statue of Isaac Newton, looking at a statue of Isaac Newton, looking at
Isaac_Newton: Sir Isaac Newton's Memoirs of Sir Isaac Newton's Life.
Isaac_Newton: Isaac Isaac Isaac Isaac Isaac Isaac Isaac Isaac Isaac Isaac Isaac Isaac Isaac Isaac Isaac Isaac Isaac Isaac Isaac Isaac Isaac Isaac Isaac Isaac Isaac Isaac Isaac Isaac Isaac Isaac Isaac Isaac Isaac Isaac Isaac Isaac Isaac Isaac Isaac Isaac Isaac Isaac Isaac Isaac Isaac Isaac Isaac Isaac Isaac Isaac Isaac Isaac Isaac Isaac Isaac Isaac Isaac Isaac Isaac Isaac Isaac Isaac Isaac Isaac Isaac Isaac Isaac Isaac Isaac Isaac Isaac Isaac Isaac Isaac Isaac Isaac Isaac Isaac Isaac Isaac Isaac Isaac Isaac Isaac Isaac Isaac Isaac Isaac Isaac Isaac Isaac Isaac Isaac Isaac Isaac Isaac Isaac Isaac Isaac Isaac Isaac Isaac Isaac Isaac Isaac Isaac Isaac Isaac Isaac Isaac
Natural_philosophy: philosophy of nature was the philosophy of nature was the philosophy of nature was the philosophy of nature was the philosophy of nature was the philosophy of nature was the philosophy of nature was the philosophy of nature was the philosophy of nature was the philosophy of nature was the philosophy of nature was the philosophy of nature was the philosophy of nature was the philosophy of nature was the philosophy of nature was the philosophy of nature was the philosophy of nature was the philosophy of nature was the philosophy of nature was the philosophy of nature was the philosophy of nature was the philosophy of nature was the philosophy of
Natural_philosophy: Natural philosophy was distinguished from the other natural philosophy. Natural philosophy was distinguished from the other natural philosophy.
Natural_philosophy: chairs of Natural Philosophy established in general, chairs of Natural Philosophy established in general, chairs of Natural Philosophy established in general, chairs of Natural Philosophy established in general, chairs of Natural Philosophy established in general, chairs of Natural Philosophy established in general, chairs of Natural Philosophy established in general, chairs of Natural Philosophy established in general, chairs of Natural Philosophy established in general, chairs of Natural Philosophy established in general, chairs of Natural Philosophy established in general, chairs of Natural Philosophy established in general, chairs of Natural Philosophy established in general, chairs of Natural Philosophy established in general,
Natural_philosophy: Natural philosophy has been categorized as a Natural philosophy. Natural philosophy has been categorized as a Natural philosophy.
Natural_philosophy: natural philosophy seeks to understand the nature of philosophy. The study of natural philosophy seeks to understand the nature of philosophy.
Natural_philosophy: of natural philosophy are representative of these works of natural philosophy. These works of natural philosophy are representative of these works of natural philosophy.
Natural_philosophy: Natural Philosophy: John S. In his Natural Philosophy: Natural Philosophy: In Praise of Natural Philosophy:: In Praise of Natural Philosophy: In his Natural Philosophy: In Natural Philosophy: In In Praise of Natural Philosophy: In Praise of Natural Philosophy: In Praise of Natural Philosophy: In Praise of Natural Philosophy: In his In Praise of Natural Philosophy: In Praise of Natural Philosophy: In his In Praise of Natural Philosophy: In
Natural_philosophy: , Natural Philosophy: A Survey of Natural Philosophy: A Survey of Natural Philosophy, David Snoke, David Snoke, Natural Philosophy: A Survey of Natural Philosophy: A Survey of Natural Philosophy: A Survey of Natural Philosophy: A Survey of Natural Philosophy, David Snoke, David Snoke, Natural Philosophy: A Survey of Natural Philosophy: A Survey of Natural Philosophy: A Survey of Natural Philosophy: A Survey of Natural Philosophy: A Survey of Natural Philosophy: A Survey of Natural Philosophy: A Survey of Natural Philosophy: A Survey of Natural Philosophy, David Sno
Natural_philosophy: Natural Philosophy: A Survey of Natural Philosophy: A Survey of Natural Philosophy: ISBN 1-931796-25-4.
I._Bernard_Cohen: Bernard Cohen was the Victor S. Thomas Thomas was the Victor S. Thomas was the Victor S. Thomas was the Victor S. Thomas was the Victor S. Thomas was the Victor S. Thomas was the Victor S. Thomas was the Victor S. Thomas was the Victor S. Thomas was the Victor S. Thomas was the Victor S. Thomas was the Victor S. Thomas was the Victor S. Thomas was the Victor S. Thomas was the Victor S. Thomas was the Victor S. Thomas was the Victor S. Thomas was the Victor S. Thomas was
University_of_California_Press: or UC Press, otherwise known as UC Press, is a non-profit, non-profit, non-profit, non-profit, non-profit, non-profit, non-profit, non-profit, non-profit, non-profit, non-profit, non-profit, non-profit, non-profit, non-profit, non-profit, non-profit, non-profit, non-profit, non-profit, non-profit, non-profit, non-profit, non-profit
University_of_California_Press: California Press publishes in the following the following: The University of California Press, University of California Press, University of California Press, University of California Press, University of California Press, University of California Press, University of California Press, University of California Press, University of California Press, University of California Press, University of California Press, University of California Press, University of California Press, University of California Press, University of California Press, University of California Press, University of California Press, University of California Press, University of California Press, University of California Press
University_of_California_Press: LuminosLuminos is the University of California Presss open access response to the University of California Presss open access response to the University of California Presss open access response to the University of California Presss open access response to the University of California Presss open access response to the University of California Presss open access response to the University of California Presss open access response to the University of California Presss open access response to the University of California Presss open access response to the University of California Press
University_of_California_Press: Berkeley: University of California Press, c1993.
